applied
sciences
Review
Industry 4.0 Technologies for Manufacturing Sustainability:
A Systematic Review and Future Research Directions
Anbesh Jamwal 1 , Rajeev Agrawal 1 , Monica Sharma 1,2 and Antonio Giallanza 3,*


Citation: Jamwal, A.; Agrawal, R.;
Sharma, M.; Giallanza, A. Industry
4.0 Technologies for Manufacturing
Sustainability: A Systematic Review
and Future Research Directions. Appl.
Sci. 2021, 11, 5725. https://doi.org/
10.3390/app11125725
Academic Editor: Richard
(Chunhui) Yang
Received: 1 June 2021
Accepted: 18 June 2021
Published: 20 June 2021
Publisher’s Note: MDPI stays neutral
with regard to jurisdictional claims in
published maps and institutional affiliations.
Copyright: © 2021 by the authors.
Licensee MDPI, Basel, Switzerland.
This article is an open access article
distributed under the terms and
conditions of the Creative Commons
Attribution (CC BY) license (https://
creativecommons.org/licenses/by/
4.0/).
1 Department of Mechanical Engineering, Malaviya National Institute of Technology, J.L.N. Marg, Jaipur,
Rajasthan 302017, India; anveshjamwal73@gmail.com (A.J.); ragrawal.mech@mnit.ac.in (R.A.);
msharma.dms@mnit.ac.in (M.S.)
2 Department of Management Studies, Malaviya National Institute of Technology, J.L.N. Marg, Jaipur,
Rajasthan 302017, India
3 Engineering Department, University of Palermo, Viale delle Scienze Building 8, 90128 Palermo, Italy
* Correspondence: antonio.giallanza@unipa.it; Tel.: +39-091-2386-1861
Abstract: Recent developments in manufacturing processes and automation have led to the new
industrial revolution termed “Industry 4.0”. Industry 4.0 can be considered as a broad domain which
includes: data management, manufacturing competitiveness, production processes and efficiency.
The term Industry 4.0 includes a variety of key enabling technologies i.e., cyber physical systems,
Internet of Things, artificial intelligence, big data analytics and digital twins which can be considered
as the major contributors to automated and digital manufacturing environments. Sustainability
can be considered as the core of business strategy which is highlighted in the United Nations (UN)
Sustainability 2030 agenda and includes smart manufacturing, energy efficient buildings and lowimpact
industrialization. Industry 4.0 technologies help to achieve sustainability in business practices.
However, very limited studies reported about the extensive reviews on these two research areas.
This study uses a systematic literature review approach to find out the current research progress and
future research potential of Industry 4.0 technologies to achieve manufacturing sustainability. The
role and impact of different Industry 4.0 technologies for manufacturing sustainability is discussed
in detail. The findings of this study provide new research scopes and future research directions in
different research areas of Industry 4.0 which will be valuable for industry and academia in order to
achieve manufacturing sustainability with Industry 4.0 technologies.
Keywords: Industry 4.0; sustainability; manufacturing; smart manufacturing; Internet of Things;
cloud manufacturing; artificial intelligence; sustainable manufacturing
1. Introduction
Competitive business environment, mass customization and globalization are forcing
“traditional” industries to adopt new business models and shift towards Industry 4.0 [1,2].
Industry 4.0 technologies can be considered as the new revolution in manufacturing which
aims to achieve maximum efficiency and output by minimum resource utilization [3].
Industry 4.0 technologies have brought a new manufacturing trend in industries which
aimed at effective resource utilization for maximum output. “Smart manufacturing”
or “digital manufacturing” can be considered as the core of Industry 4.0 which allows
industries to perform flexible manufacturing operations with mass customization [4].
Zhong et al. [5] stated that Industry 4.0 is a German initiative which aimed at creating
smart factories in which manufacturing technologies are transformed and upgraded by
the Internet of Things (IoT) and cyber-physical systems (CPS). Manufacturing systems in
Industry 4.0 can monitor the physical processes of industry and create a so called “digital
twin” of physical entities [6]. This helps to establish real time communication, intelligent
decision making and man–machine interaction in manufacturing organizations. Industry
4.0 technologies combined smart production with embedded production system which has
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725. https://doi.org/10.3390/app11125725 https://www.mdpi.com/journal/applsci
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 2 of 27
transformed the production value chains, industry value chain and traditional business
models of organizations [7]. IoT, CPS, augmented and virtual reality, blockchain technology,
machine learning (ML), artificial intelligence (AI), big data analytics and digital twins can
be considered as key enabling technologies for Industry 4.0 practices [8]. It is believed that
Industry 4.0 technologies will help to enhance the social and economic sustainability of
organizations [3]. Industry 4.0 technologies have a remarkable potential for sustainable
value creation across the economic, environmental and social dimension of sustainability
by improving resource efficiency [9].
Despite the probable opportunities for manufacturing sustainability in Industry 4.0,
there are few review studies that have explored the Industry 4.0 technologies with different
sustainability perspectives [4,8–10]. Stock and Seliger [3] highlighted the sustainable manufacturing
(SM) opportunities in Industry 4.0. Kamble et al. [10] developed a sustainability
framework for Industry 4.0. Jabbour et al. [9] identified critical success factors for SM
in Industry 4.0 era. Machado et al. [4] highlighted new research trends and scopes for
SM in Industry 4.0. Sharma et al. [8] presented a bibliometric-based review to highlight
research opportunities for SM in Industry 4.0. Bag et al. [11] highlighted the relationship
between the circular economy, SM and Industry 4.0 practices. This shows that there is
growing interest in the area of SM and Industry 4.0, yet there is scarcity of systematic
review which highlight new research scopes for manufacturing sustainability in Industry
4.0. The past review studies were limited to a specific database. This paper seeks to explore
the research trends and scopes for manufacturing sustainability in Industry 4.0 with three
major databases i.e., IEEE, Web of Sciences and Scopus. This paper also highlights the
research trends in manufacturing area in ten different Industry 4.0 technologies and then
provide the sustainability issues for manufacturing.
The structure of this review paper is as follows. Section 2 highlights the basic concepts
and terminology related to sustainability and Industry 4.0. Section 3 presents the review
protocol and methodology. Section 4 presents the results of systematic literature review.
Section 5 presents the role of different Industry 4.0 technologies to achieve sustainability.
Section 6 presents the opportunities of Industry 4.0 technologies to achieve manufacturing
sustainability. Section 7 presents research gaps in Industry 4.0 to achieve sustainability, and
Section 8 presents the conclusion and future scopes of study.
2. Basic Concepts and Terminology
In this section basic terminologies of sustainable manufacturing (SM) and Industry
4.0 are presented to construct the link between both these two approaches.
2.1. Concept and Definitions of Sustainable Manufacturing
Sustainable manufacturing covers the three basic elements involved in manufacturing
i.e., processes, products and systems which enables economic growth and sustainable value
creation in industries [12]. To ensure sustainability in manufacturing these three elements
must individually demonstrate the benefits at the social, economic and environmental
levels [13]. Sustainable manufacturing can be described as the integration of systems and
various processes to produce a high quality of products with minimum resource utilization,
sustainable resources, being safer for customers, employees and communities [14].
Main Definitions of Sustainable Manufacturing (SM)
The first definition for sustainability is discussed in the United Nations (UN) Brundtland
Commission report published in 1987: “Development which meets the needs of
current generation without compromising the ability of future generations to meet their
own needs” [15]. This definition was further used in different initiatives e.g., the 2015
Sustainable Development Goals UN initiative. This definition is not acceptable in operational
areas of manufacturing [16]. Several efforts have been made to propose a definition
for SM in previously published studies [12,14]. Jayal et al. [14] defined SM as the design
of industrial system which can ensure the natural resources for quality of life and have
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 3 of 27
minimum negative impact on environmental and human health. The US Department of
Commerce defined SM as “the creation of products through the processes that minimize
both negative environmental impacts and consumption of energy and natural resources,
being also safe for employees, communities, consumers and economically viable” [17].
2.2. Industry 4.0
Industry 4.0 is also termed the “fourth industrial revolution” coined at the Hanover
fair, 2011, in Germany [6,18]. The German Federal Government launched Industry 4.0 as the
high-technology plan for German industries in 2014 [4]. Industry 4.0 can be described as the
current trends in data exchange and automation between the manufacturing technologies
or activities. Industry 4.0 is focused on the development of “smart” factories which
can meet the dynamic manufacturing scenarios, management goals and new business
models [2]. Cyber physical systems (CPS), augmented and virtual reality, blockchain
technology, additive manufacturing, flexible manufacturing system, reconfigurability,
Internet of Things (IoT), machine and deep learning, artificial intelligence, big data analytics
and cloud computing are the main key enabling technologies of Industry 4.0 [19,20]. The
past three industrial revolutions (Industry 1.0; Industry 2.0; Industry 3.0) were driven
by mechanization, electrification and information technology in manufacturing which
enhanced resource utilization as well as productivity [5]. In Industry 4.0, the CPS is the
underlying technology which has the potential for mass customization by modularity
and changeability in production systems [10]. CPS can connect physical entities, enable
man–machine interaction, infrastructure, processes and other activities in system when
connected with IoT [21]. The interaction between IoT and CPS enables the communication
between the physical entities and virtual world by exchanging data collected through
sensors and generated from manufacturing activities [22]. Meanwhile other technologies
of Industry 4.0 act as enablers for Industry 4.0-enabled business practices.
2.3. Relationship and Link between Industry 4.0 and Sustainable Manufacturing
Both sustainability and Industry 4.0 are the emerging research areas in the engineering.
The main practices in these two areas are sustainable designing, life-cycle management,
re-manufacturing, circular economy, lean and green management, environmental management.
Stock and Seliger [3] discussed the macro and micro perspective of the sustainable
manufacturing in Industry 4.0. It is found that Industry 4.0 technologies helps to create
sustainable value in all three dimensions of sustainability. New opportunities have
been discussed such as: (1) business models driven by smart data; (2) closed loop supply
chain networks; (3) digitalization in small and medium enterprises (SMEs); (4) training
of employees with information and communication technologies (ICT); (5) sustainable
product design; and, (6) decentralized manufacturing lines. Kamble et al. [10] presented the
sustainable Industry 4.0 framework and discussed the sustainable benefits from Industry
4.0 technologies in terms of resource efficiency and productivity. Bag et al. [11] discussed
how sustainable manufacturing and Industry 4.0 practices can improve the energy consumption,
waste reduction and resource efficiency. The relationship between Industry 4.0
and sustainable manufacturing was discussed with the help of a conceptual framework.
Machado et al. [4] discussed the emerging research areas in the sustainable manufacturing
and Industry 4.0 by a systematic literature review and highlighted some research scopes
related to supply chains and man-machine interaction.
3. Materials and Methods
In the present study we have used the systematic literature review (SLR) approach
which helps to deliver a comprehensive and clear overview of literature analysis as compared
to a descriptive literature review. Refs. [23–25] stated that systematic literature as
a suitable approach to identify the new research opportunities in a research area by analyzing
and synthesizing previously published articles. However, Petticrew [26] defined a
systematic literature review as:
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 4 of 27
“An efficient technique for hypothesis testing, for summarizing the results of
existing studies, and for assessing consistency among previous studies; these
tasks are clearly unique to medicine.”
In the past few years SLR approaches have been applied in different research areas by
the use of different databases [27,28]. However, many studies have reported the use of SLR
approaches with a single scientific database. Samala et al. [28] discussed the advantages of
using of multiple databases in SLR approaches. Industry 4.0 is an emerging research trend
among practitioners and researchers. Antony et al. [29] stated that much less literature is
accessible to practitioners which provide the information regarding new innovations and
research opportunities in industries. SLR can help to find out the research trends and new
opportunities in a particular research area.
3.1. Research Questions
A total of three research questions (RQ) were formulated in the present study as follows:
RQ1: What is the role of different Industry 4.0 technologies in achieving manufacturing
sustainability?
RQ2: How can Industry 4.0 technologies contribute to sustainability in manufacturing?
RQ3: What are main research gaps in Industry 4.0 technologies for manufacturing
sustainability and what are the research issues that need to be addressed in future?
3.2. Search Strategy
The search of peer reviewed journal articles and conference articles was implemented
in April 2021 for the articles related to manufacturing sustainability and Industry 4.0
technologies. The search for articles was conducted by using the keywords related to the
research area as follows: (TITLE-ABS-KEY (“Industry 4.0” OR “smart manufacturing”)
AND TITLE-ABS-KEY (“manufacturing sustainability” OR “sustainable manufacturing”
OR “Sustainability” AND “Manufacturing”)).
The inclusion criteria for the study were as follows:
1. Articles published in the English language;
2. Articles published before May 2021;
3. Articles should be from peer reviewed journals or conference proceedings;
4. Articles focused in the area of Industry 4.0 technologies andmanufacturing sustainability;
5. Articles must be in short or full version (not an editorial or abstract).
Three major databases linked with the research area which include the article collection
from Industry 4.0 and sustainability were selected for the primary search. These databases
included Scopus, IEEE explore andWeb of Science. The search and selection process for
articles is discussed in Figure 1.
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 5 of 27
Figure 1. Literature review search and selection process.
4. Results
4.1. Year-Wise Publication Progress
Industry 4.0 and sustainability are the emerging research areas in manufacturing. In
the last few years studies related to sustainability issues in Industry 4.0 has made several
research scopes. The number of publications in this area is increasing every year (See
Figure 2). It can be observed that very few articles were published in this area from
2015–2017. In last three years the number of publications has increased demonstrating the
growing interest of researchers in Industry 4.0 and sustainability.
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 6 of 27
Figure 2. Year-wise publication in Industry 4.0 and sustainability.
4.2. Highly Cited Papers (Global Citations)
The list of top cited articles in Industry 4.0 and manufacturing sustainability area is
shown in the Table 1 with their contributions and total global citation. In the study three
databases have been considered for the article collection so the global citation score is
considered to find the top cited articles.
Table 1. Most cited articles (global citations).
Author Contribution Total Global Citations
[3] Highlighted opportunities for SM in Industry 4.0 1305
[10] Developed a sustainability framework for Industry 4.0 387
[30] Empirical investigation on German manufacturing industries in five sectors 348
[31] Empirical investigation on 46 German manufacturing industries 348
[9] Identified critical success factors for SM practices in Industry 4.0 304
[32] Challenges for Sustainable supply chain for manufacturing sustainability in Industry 4.0 278
[33] Opportunities for IoT in sustainable supply chain for manufacturing sustainability 225
4.3. Most Productive Journals
In this study, journal classification was extracted with R studio using the bibliometrix
package. In the classification of journals, it was found that the Journal of Cleaner Production
had most publications related to Industry 4.0 and sustainability followed by Procedia CIRP,
IFAC Papersonline and International Journal of Production Research. The top 10 journals with
their publication count are shown in Figure 3.
4.4. Top Subject Areas
Figure 4 shows the distribution of 127 articles by their subject area. In an analysis
it was found that some articles lie in more than one subject area. Most of the articles
reported from the “Engineering” subject area include sub-areas like architecture design
and experimental investigations. However, some articles from “Environmental science”
are focused on sub-areas like life-cycle analysis and environmental related issues.
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 7 of 27
Figure 3. Journal-wise distribution of articles.
Figure 4. Articles distributed based on subject areas.
4.5. Most Used Keywords
The most used authors keywords in Industry 4.0 and manufacturing sustainability
articles were extracted using the RStudio (See Figure 5). “Industry 4.0” was the mostly used
keyword with 81 occurrences, followed by “Sustainable development (57) and “Sustainable
Manufacturing” (40) occurrence. In most publications “Industry 4.0” was used as the main
keyword while in some publications “smart manufacturing” was used as a main keyword.
Figure 5. Main keywords used in articles related to Industry 4.0 and manufacturing sustainability.
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 8 of 27
5. Discussion on Review Results
RQ1: What is the role of different Industry 4.0 technologies in achieving manufacturing
sustainability?
5.1. Concepts and Theories Related to Manufacturing in Industry 4.0
Industry 4.0 is the current research trend for data exchange and automation in manufacturing
activities which connect the different physical entities in systems such as: sensors
and actuators with the IoT so that they can interact and transmit the information [4,34]. In
Industry 4.0 information can be exchanged between the machines as well as humans known
as human–machine collaboration [35]. Production activities in Industry 4.0 are different
from the traditional industry practices as real time production planning and control can be
done in Industry 4.0 [36]. Industry 4.0 is driven by increased competitiveness from the use
of sustainability in production, efficient manufacturing systems, horizontal and vertical
integration of technologies [37].
Shop-Floor Activities
Shop-floor activities can be considered as the main elements to achieve sustainability
in manufacturing processes. On the shop floor, the main entities (conveyors, pallets and
machining cells), sensors and other digital technologies can communicate with each other
for the data exchange [38]. This generated data can be analyzed with machine learning
approaches or big data analytics and can be used for intelligent decision making [39]. The
shop-floor activities in Industry 4.0 includes predictive maintenance, real time quality
and safety monitoring and remote monitoring of activities which helps to create a smart
shop floor [40]. Mittal et al. [41] stated that SMEs need a wide area network facility
and automation facilities on the shop floor to enhance Industry 4.0 practices. Yang and
Takakuwa [38] proposed a simulation based approach for flexible manufacturing system
in Industry 4.0 for shop floor activities and found that the proposed model is helpful for
decision making in manufacturing activities. Moica et al. [40] proposed a maturity model
for an automotive industry to change the shop floor management into a smart shop floor
using three main elements: (1) Envision (2) Enact and, (3) Enable. Schmidt et al. [42]
proposed an Industry 4.0-based lean shop floor management system using deep learning
(96.5% accuracy) and EEG (electroencephalogram) sensors. Very few studies were found
directly related to shop floor management or smart shop floor activities in Industry 4.0.
5.2. Main Technologies of Industry 4.0 for Achieving Sustainability
5.2.1. Additive Manufacturing
In the traditional manufacturing processes machining operations such as drilling,
cutting and grinding operations are used to convert raw material into the final product
which can be referred as “subtractive manufacturing” processes. In these processes a large
amount of waste is generated in the form of chips and scraps which affects sustainability in
terms of both economic and environmental sustainability. In Industry 4.0 industries focus
on the adoption of additive manufacturing technologies which produce less waste and environmental
impacts as compared to traditional manufacturing processes [27]. Also, these
technologies help to complete the customized demands of customers through layer-by-layer
manufacturing working on a CAD (computer aided design) model. Generally, additive
manufacturing processes helps to enhance the adoption of Industry 4.0 practices [43].
Korner et al.; Haleem and Javid [27,44] discussed the role of additive manufacturing
processes in Industry 4.0. Godina et al. [43] investigated the impact assessment of additive
manufacturing practices on sustainable business models in Industry 4.0. Ford and
Despeisse [45] stated that additive manufacturing helps to improve resource efficiency,
sustainability and enables material flow in a closed loop. Jamwal et al.; Yadav et al. [46,47]
highlighted additive manufacturing practices as an enabler for Industry 4.0 practices to
achieve sustainability. Mittal et al. [48] highlighted the importance of additive manufacturing
technology in the Industry 4.0 roadmap development.
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 9 of 27
5.2.2. Role of Big Data Analytics and Digital Twin
Big data analytics is use of advanced computing technologies which can be used to
find the trends, preferences and correlations on the larger data sets in industries for effective
decision making [49]. In Industry 4.0 the role of big data analytics is very important which
includes key areas such as smart factories in which data are captured from the sensors
during the manufacturing or production activities [6]. This data can be analyzed with big
data approaches and can be used for predictive maintenance operations in future. The
main benefits of big data analytics in Industry 4.0 are optimization, real-time monitoring,
production efficiency and production management automation which is currently shaping
industries for fourth industrial revolution [50].
Wang andWang [49] discussed the importance of big data analytics in Industry 4.0
and cyber physical systems. It was found that big data analytics approaches help to reduce
the breakdowns and unscheduled downtime by 25% in manufacturing industries.
Branco et al.; Frank et al.; Papadopoulos et al. References [51–53] discussed the implications
for big data implementation in Industry 4.0 practices and discussed how big data
approaches help to automate production activities by reducing human inputs. Li et al. [54]
presented the big data enabled smart factory framework for Industry 4.0 practices in which
shop floor activities, cloud and smart products can communicate with each other. The
results of the study indicated the improvement in efficiency and load balancing.
Digital twins are the virtual representation which serves as a real-time digital counter
part of physical entities in a system. Digital twins can be considered the result of continual
improvements in product design and manufacturing activities in an industry. However,
Kim, 2017, [6] stated digital twins are the software representation of any physical asset,
process or system designed to optimize, predict and detect by the real-time data analytics.
Some studies reported about 30% cost reductions, 20% planning time reductions, and 8%
productivity improvements with the help of digital twins [5]. Refs. [2,55] discussed the role
and opportunities for digital twins in manufacturing industries in the Industry 4.0 context.
Ke et al., 2019 [56] proposed an interaction framework based on digital twin, augmented
reality (AR) and virtual reality (VR) technologies for Industry 4.0 enabled manufacturing
practices. Wang and Wang, 2019, [57] introduced the Industry 4.0 and digital twin enablers
for waste electronic and electrical equipment recovery and discussed the role of computer
graphics in the development of digital twins.
5.2.3. Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning
Artificial intelligence (AI) and machine learning (ML) are considered as fundamental
bases for Industry 4.0 which helps to make industries more productive and autonomous [58].
AI is the combination of several technologies that allow machines and software to understand,
sense, act and learn based on self-learning or augmented human activities [59].
Research on AI in industry can be categorized into four major areas: (1) predictive quality
and maintenance; (2) generative design; (3) supply chain activities; (4) human–robot
collaboration [58]. Jamwal et al. [39] discussed the role of machine learning approaches
in manufacturing sustainability. It was also found that ML approaches help to analyze
the large amount of data generated from the sustainable manufacturing operations. The
benefits of using ML are discussed in the three aspects of sustainability with some new
research scopes for Industry 4.0 practices. The major benefits of using ML and AI approaches
results in error reduction, cost reduction and revenue growth in manufacturing
industries. In the initial efforts, Lee et al. [58] discussed the roadmap for AI-enabled
manufacturing systems for Industry 4.0 practices. In the study, the current state of AI
technologies and eco-systems for manufacturing applications is discussed in the Industry
4.0 context. Yao et al. [60] discussed the evolution of smart manufacturing from intelligent
manufacturing with AI technologies. The comparison between intelligent manufacturing
and smart manufacturing is discussed in detail. Bajic et al.; Cioffi et al. [61,62] discussed
the applications, opportunities and challenges for AI and ML techniques in Industry 4.0.
Angelopoulos et al. [63] discussed the fault diagnosis with the help ML approaches in
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 10 of 27
Industry 4.0 due to machine degradation. A detailed overview of ML approaches was
provided for manufacturing activities to minimize the errors and improve human–machine
interaction. Cinar et al. [64] discussed opportunities of ML for predictive maintenance
in Industry 4.0 by providing a comprehensive review on ML and smart manufacturing.
It was found that ML and AI applications are the emerging research areas in sustainable
smart manufacturing. Candanedo et al. [65] proposed a predictive model for Industry 4.0
practices. A case for HVAC(heating, ventilation and air conditioning) is presented in which
data generated from a HVAC is utilized to predict and analyze that system temperature
range using ML algorithms. However, few studies reported about the applications of AI
and ML technologies in zero defect manufacturing. Psarommatis et al. 2020, [66] presented
the state of the art on zero defect manufacturing and discussed the research opportunities
for machine learning and AI technologies. Huang et al. 2018, [67] discussed about the
application of machine learning and AI technologies in real-time quality prediction and
monitoring of defects in micro-semiconductor manufacturing. Lindström et al., 2020, [68]
proposed a zero defect manufacturing model for industries with an Industry 4.0 perspective.
It was found that the proposed model helps to improve the sustainability, profitability,
efficiency and manufacturing competitiveness. Eger et al., 2018, [69] discussed the zero defect
manufacturing strategies in the Industry 4.0 context for scrap reduction in multi-stage
production system. Psarommatis et al., 2020, [70] discussed the opportunities for AI-based
algorithms for flexible job shop re-scheduling in zero-defect manufacturing. The above
literature reveals that AI and machine learning based technologies delivers the skill set and
zero defect manufacturing opportunities for Industry 4.0 which will help to improve the
sustainability and efficiency of manufacturing industries.
5.2.4. Internet of Things (IoT)
Industries are adopting IoT technologies to improve production quality and reduce
downtime by digitalization in manufacturing [71]. In developed nations, manufacturing
organizations are already automated up to a good extent. Industries have already
automation and digitalization on shop floor which is basic requirement for Industry 4.0
practices [46,47]. IoT is one of key enabling technologies for Industry 4.0 which contributes
towards manufacturing excellence and digital transformation of industries. The major issues
in industries are IT-OT (internet technology and operational technology) integration in
the manufacturing activities which resulted in lack of quality, plant visibility and inefficient
inventory management [72]. IoT technologies helps to bridge gap between the OT and IT
systems by connected the control systems, sensors, PLCs (programmable logic controller)
and data transfer to cloud and ERP (enterprise resource planning) [73]. Wan et al. [74] proposed
a framework for IoT based manufacturing focused on smart factory. In the study role
of dynamic resource management for complex resource allocation problems is presented.
Frank et al. [1] discussed the how IoT technologies in industry help to reduce downtime,
improve quality and improve predictive and preventive analysis. Gerrikagoitia et al. [75]
found IoT technologies as the main driver for Industry 4.0 practices. In the review different
approaches with the different manufacturing scenario i.e., dynamic market changes for
digital manufacturing is discussed. Kim; Xu et al. [6,76] reported about the state of art
of IoT technologies in Industry 4.0. It is noted that wireless sensors networks and RFID
(radio frequency identification) are the most important devices which helps to enable a IoT
based manufacturing. Beier et al. [77] stated that Industry 4.0 uses the cognitive computing
approaches with IoT to automate the manufacturing activities. Saglain et al. [71] proposed
a IoT-based framework for smart manufacturing which can manage process control, online
monitoring and large industry data sets. In the proposed framework five main layers were
considered to manage a large amount of data generated from the regular manufacturing
activities in industries. Thramboulidis et al. [22] conducted two case studies to validate an
IoT-based manufacturing framework in which cyber-physical microservices considered as
key construct. Singh and Bhanot [78] analyzed the 10 critical challenges related to IoT-based
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 11 of 27
manufacturing in industries with a DEMATEL-ISM approach and found cyber security as
main challenge.
5.2.5. Cloud Computing and Manufacturing
Cloud computing in Industry 4.0 can be considered a key enabler that offers advantages
like computational power required to apply ML, AI approaches and other smart
technologies in Industry 4.0 [79]. Few studies reported about the uncertainties regarding
the suitability of cloud computing in manufacturing organizations [6,80,81]. Cloud computing
and Industry 4.0 enables the services, manufacturing networking and data over the
internet in manufacturing activities [82]. Advanced cloud technologies are widely used for
data sharing across the organizational boundaries which has resulted in improved flexibility
and agility of systems [83]. Xu [79] stated that cloud service providers provide three
kind of cloud services for manufacturing industries: (1) software as service i.e., ready to
use services; (2) infrastructure as a service i.e., virtual CPUs (central processing unit) or networks;
(3) platform as a service i.e., virtual machines and operating systems. Tao et al. [84]
proposed a service oriented and computing based cloud manufacturing model for industries
to improve resource utilization and reduce energy consumption. Li et al. [81]
proposed a cloud manufacturing model which consists of IoT, AI technologies and services
to achieve a life cycle in smart manufacturing. In the study, four applications of the model
for large enterprises and small and medium enterprises are discussed. Adamson et al.;
Liu et al.;Wu et al. [82,85,86] discussed the concept of cloud-based manufacturing for industries
and highlighted research issues for the fourth industrial revolution. In the studies,
various definitions related to cloud manufacturing is discussed. These studies provides
future research directions for both academia and practitioners. Coronado et al. [87] stated
that both mobile and cloud technologies are important for smart manufacturing. In the
study, an android-based manufacturing execution system (MES) is proposed for small
manufacturing facilities. The information from MES is used to create factory digital twins.
Varela et al. [88] presented a systematic review of cloud-based collaborative manufacturing
and highlighted process and scheduling plan generation as the main challenge for industries.
Liu et al. [83] highlighted scheduling issues for cloud-based manufacturing and found
workshop and supply chain scheduling as the emerging areas in cloud manufacturing.
Lu and Xu [89] proposed a generic architecture for cloud-based manufacturing based on
big data analytics and cyber-physical systems. It was found that the proposed architecture
enables the on-demand manufacturing services via the network. Mubarok et al. [90]
proposed a hierarchical reliability-based assessment model for cloud manufacturing. In
the proposed model resources at three level i.e., system, machine and component levels
are evaluated. Caggiano et al. [80] proposed a model for cloud manufacturing to monitor
smart diagnosis in manufacturing. It was found that, based on cloud diagnosis corrective
action such as tool replacement, parameter changes and process halting can be undertaken
by a local server. Fisher et al. [91] stated that cloud-based manufacturing is an advanced
service-oriented business model in which resources and manufacturing capabilities can
be shared on a cloud platform. Cloud manufacturing can provide sustainable and robust
route for manufacturing industries to achieve sustainability.
5.2.6. Augmented and Virtual Reality
Augmented reality is the set of technologies in which the real world environment can
be viewed in an enhanced or augmented way with the help of computer graphics [92]. The
visual aspects of physical entities in the system can be enhanced by use of various devices.
Augmented reality has a wide range of applications in Industry 4.0 but the manufacturing
domain is more attractive area for researchers [93]. The various stages of the product life
cycle need real time information i.e., about design to prototyping, maintenance operations
and assembly operations. These stages have many challenges which can be addressed by
augmented reality through simulation which results in reduced downtime in industries
and streamlines of operations [94]. Similarly, virtual reality technologies have opened the
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 12 of 27
various avenues in industries to develop innovative solution as manufacturing units by
use of simulation tools, smart machines, data analytics and high connectivity between
workstations. These changes in manufacturing units have refined the production capabilities
of industries and meet the dynamic demands of markets [94–96]. Lee [97] proposed a
real-time material flow simulator and layout for manufacturing problems. In the proposed
framework integrated AR and manufacturing techniques are used for manufacturing issues
in large enterprises. The results of the study indicated the more accurate results through the
simulation and AR approaches for manufacturing modeling. Nabati et al. [95] presented
an overview on VR applications for energy-efficient manufacturing and found that VR technologies
helps to minimize the energy consumption in Industry 4.0 during manufacturing.
Rumsey and Dantec [98] conducted a study in global aviation manufacturing headquarters
in the United States through surveys and interviews and provided an initial insight on
organizational impact of AR and VR technologies. Shiba and Imai [96] developed a lesson
support system for manufacturing applications using AR technologies. The proposed system
is helpful to manage the digital data and reduce human efforts in training. Bottani and
Vignali [92] presented a review on AR technology in manufacturing industries in which
major application areas of manufacturing such as assembly and maintenance operations
were explored. Lai et al. [94] proposed integrated Faster R-CNN (region based convolutional
network) and AR instructional system for intelligent manufacturing. The results of
study reported the reduction in errors and assembly time as compared to conventional
method. Mittal et al. [99] found AR and VR technologies as the main enablers for smart
manufacturing practices. Malik et al. [100] explored the advancements and development in
VR technology for human-centered production systems. In the study, a simulation-based
human centered VR framework is proposed for manufacturing to reduce cycle time, robot
control, layout optimization and process plan development. Mandic [101] proposed a
model-based manufacturing system for Industry 4.0 using AR and rapid technologies for
design and fabrication of a sheet metal process.
5.2.7. Blockchain Technology
Blockchain technology in Industry 4.0 offers new tools to address sustainability issues,
security, efficiency and resiliency of systems as well as transparent and decentralized
transaction systems [102,103]. The traceability and transparency characteristics offered
by blockchain enhance manufacturing network sustainability. Leng et al. [102] discussed
12 metrics for blockchain adoption in the manufacturing sector. In the study, a list of
social challenges and barriers for blockchain empowered manufacturing is discussed.
Li et al. [103] developed a distributed network for cloud-based manufacturing in which
blockchain technology is used as standard. The results of the study indicated that the
proposed approach has more advantages over the scalability and security. Lee et al. [21]
discussed the blockchain technology potentials in cyber physical production systems
and proposed a three-level architecture for blockchain enabled manufacturing practices.
Westerkamp et al. [104] proposed a method for manufacturing goods and components
traceability. In the proposed model products are represented as digital tokens created on
blockchain. The results of study indicated that blockchain technology in manufacturing
operations helps in process traceability. Lohmer and Lasch [105] conducted an empirical
investigation on manufacturing and blockchain with the survey-based method in which
legal uncertainties, unclear governance and a lack of standardization are found as major
barriers. Ko et al. [106] reviewed the current blockchain applications in the manufacturing
sector and examined how blockchain technology helps in cost saving and real-time
transparency in manufacturing. A conceptual model is proposed to ensure sustainability
in manufacturing practices. Yu et al. [107] proposed a blockchain-based architecture to
enhance decentralization and transparency in manufacturing activities. The proposed
model is solved with the particle swarm optimization approach and simulations were
performed. Aghamohammadzadeh et al. [108] introduced a novel blockchain based manufacturing
architecture. The proposed architecture can provide service collaboration for
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 13 of 27
service providers and service optimality. Zhang et al. [109] investigated the blockchain
based trust mechanism and security and provides a particular application for quality assurance
in smart manufacturing. A survey is conducted in the dairy industry and found that
blockchain technology improves the transparency and security in the smart manufacturing.
Yu et al. [110] proposed a blockchain-shared manufacturing framework to support cyber
physical system. It was found that a smart contract network and proof of participation
assure the sustainability of resource operation blockchain and stability. Tao et al. [111]
proposed a digital twin and blockchain-based framework for smart manufacturing. In the
study digital twin and blockchain service management related challenges are discussed.
Barenji et al. [112] used two types of blockchain network: (1) public (service provide level);
(2) private (shop level), which are connected with the machine level to receive and gather
the data. Ouyang et al. [113] proposed a blockchain-based framework for collaborative
manufacturing to design and optimize the manufacturing.
5.2.8. Flexible and Reconfigurable Manufacturing Systems
In the past, manufacturing industries were driven by mass production aiming at
same type of high-quality products at high volume. In today’s scenario, increasing customer
demands and human lifestyles have changed market demands which are driven
by mass customization with a higher volume of production [4,77]. Mass customization
in industries requires machine intelligence as well as high level of automation which has
increased manufacturing costs and slowed down production processes [38]. Reconfigurable
manufacturing systems (RMS) and flexible manufacturing systems (FMS) have
introduced in industries to solve these problems which are now combing with Industry
4.0 technologies [114]. Khezri et al. [115] addressed sustainability issues in reconfigurable
manufacturing systems in process planning and stated that RMS systems as an enabler
for Industry 4.0 practices to reduce the reconfigurability effort during dynamic changes in
the market. Touzout and Benyoucef; Alcácer and Machado [114,116] stated that RMS and
FMS as the main enablers for Industry 4.0 to complete mass customization demands from
customers. Vaidya et al. [117] discussed the opportunities for RMS and FMS in Industry 4.0.
It was noted that RMS systems helps to reduce the reconfigurable effort in manufacturing
systems which can easily adapt the dynamic changes in market. Long et al. [118] proposed
a model for a flexible production system in Industry 4.0 with three machines to reduce the
machine failures. Suzic et al.; Wang et al. [119,120] discussed the FMS as the guidelines for
the mass customization production in Industry 4.0. Khalil et al. [121] proposed a modelbased
system engineering method for FMS in Industry 4.0. In the study, decision support
systems are proposed based on three solutions (RMS, scheduling optimization and FMS)
with real-time data from industries. Florescu and Barabas [122] proposed a material flow
design methodology for FMS. Different manufacturing scenarios have evaluated in the
model using the simulation and virtual modelling approaches. It was found that this model
is helpful in the development of intelligent manufacturing systems where control systems
can use the simulations to regulate the process parameters for predictive maintenance.
Luscinski and Ivanov [123] developed a simulation model for FMS using ontology on flexibility.
A simulation model was developed using FlexSim modeling software and industry
examples were used to check the applicability of the model. Sang et al. [124] proposed a
FIWARE-based framework for predictive maintenance in FMS. The effectiveness of model
is tested with the industry case study. The results indicated the reduction in cost and
unnecessary downtimes.
5.2.9. Robotics
Industrial robots are more digitally connected and use more sensors which makes
them less susceptible in the Industry 4.0 environment. Robotics-enabled manufacturing
in Industry 4.0 helps to reduce downtime and maximize efficiency [125]. Unscheduled
downtime is one the major issues at the present time which results in inefficiency in
industries. Robotic technology helps to minimize the reconfigurable effort which results
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 14 of 27
in minimizing errors as well as improvement quality and production [126]. Goel and
Gupta, and Dhanabalan and Sathish [125,127] discussed the roadmaps for robotics in
Industry 4.0. In these studies it is discussed how industries can transform themselves
to Industry 4.0 with robotics and AI technologies. Braganca et al. [128] presented an
overview on collaborative robotics to support workers for manufacturing in Industry
4.0. The main advantages of collaborative robotics such as human–robot collaboration,
cognitive tasks and physical tasks was discussed. Xu et al. [76] stated that modern robotic
technology in Industry 4.0 offers flexibility and autonomy which results in cost advantages
and human safety. Robotic technology in Industry 4.0 has a wide range of capabilities
that can also perform most of manufacturing operations in intelligent manufacturing
environment. Karabegovi´c et al. [129] implemented Industry 4.0 and robotic technologies in
manufacturing processes. The benefits of implementation in terms of self-optimization, selfdiagnosis,
self-configuration, self-automation and intelligent decision making is discussed.
Fragapane et al. [130] compared the production activities in traditional manufacturing
and Industry 4.0 by proposing an analytical model that uses autonomous mobile robots
(AMR). The sensitivity analysis results of the study revealed that number of shifts and cost
of AMR are the key factors to improve productivity and flexibility in Industry 4.0 practices.
Karabegovi´c [131] discussed the role of service and industrial robots in the development
of Industry 4.0 and smart manufacturing. It was noted that robotics technology ensures
the safety in the shop floor and with robotic technology manufacturing has become more
flexible. Wan et al. [132] introduced a context-aware robotic model for material handling in
industries. In the study, challenges, advantages and system architecture are discussed in
detail. A case study is performed to minimize the energy consumption and cost reduction
in material-handling problems. Simulation results of study shows the reduction in cost
and energy consumption in material handling operations.
5.2.10. Cyber Security
Smart factories in Industry 4.0 can be subjected to vulnerability exploitation, device
hacking, malware attacks and other common attacks which are also faced the other network
[133]. The cyber-attacks in Industry 4.0 can disrupt manufacturing activities and will
be difficult for manufacturers to detect and defend from cyber attacks [134]. Manufacturing
in Industry 4.0 is based on cyber-physical production systems and IoT based network which
are connected to many sensors and communication devices in the system [10]. At present,
cyber security threats are major issues in Industry 4.0. Once malicious software or any
virus attack enter a cyber physical production system they can communicate with different
machines and layers through communication networks which can affect the manufacturing
activities [135]. These viruses or malicious software can destroy the manufacturer data
or change the manufacturing process which result in system breakdown or downtime.
Industrial data is highly sensitive as it requires information related to products and other
copyright details which can be affected by cyber attacks [136]. Culot et al., and Ervural
and Ervural [133,134] addressed the challenges related to cyber security for cyber physical
based production systems in Industry 4.0 in which modification in firmware and malware
intrusions are found to be major issues. Lezzi et al. [137] presented an overview of current
issues related to cybersecurity for manufacturing in Industry 4.0. Ghobakhloo [138]
discussed the importance of cyber security-related issues for Industry 4.0 roadmap development.
It is noted that cyber-attacks can disrupt the manufacturing activities. So, the
industries need to work more on cyber security related issues. Wegner et al. [139] presented
a new approach for cybersecurity issues in Industry 4.0 which limits the information flow
to authorized and internal floor devices in a system. Rubio et al. [135] analyzed the cyber
security-related threats in Industry 4.0 context.
RQ2: How can Industry 4.0 technologies contribute to sustainability in manufacturing?
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 15 of 27
6. Manufacturing Sustainability in Industry 4.0
Manufacturing sustainability is more about development and growth of industries
in a socially equitable and eco-friendly manner rather than minimizing carbon emission
and pollution [140]. Sustainability can be considered as the core of business strategy
which is highlighted in the UN Sustainability 2030 agenda which includes smart manufacturing,
energy efficient buildings and low impact industrialization [141]. Stock and
Seliger [3] discussed the role of sustainable manufacturing practices in Industry 4.0 and
found that Industry 4.0 technologies will open the opportunities for sustainability in
business. Jabbour et al. [9] found that Industry 4.0 practices will unlock opportunities for
green manufacturing practices. A future research agenda and framework for sustainability
practices in Industry 4.0 is proposed. Yadav et al. [47] find the critical enablers for the
Industry 4.0 technologies to achieve sustainability in manufacturing practices. In the
study it was found that adoption of renewable energy sources and adoption of sustainable
policies in manufacturing practices help to achieve sustainability in Industry 4.0 practices.
Jamwal et al. [46] proposed a sustainability framework for Industry 4.0 practices. It was
noted that multi-national enterprises are now investing more in emerging economies for
Industry 4.0 practices because of cheap labour cost. Developing nations have more opportunities
for the sustainability in Industry 4.0 as the economy is largely dependent on
small and medium enterprises (SMEs). Mittal et al. [48] reviewed the maturity models
for Industry 4.0 and found that opportunities for MNCs (multi-national companies) and
SMEs are different. There is need to different roadmap and maturity model for SMEs to
unlock the sustainability benefits of Industry 4.0 practices. Ghobakhloo [142] discussed the
sustainability opportunities in Industry 4.0. In the study, critical sustainability functions
for Industry 4.0 were analyzed with the ISM (interpretive structural modeling) approach
and found that business model innovation and production efficiency are the main critical
functions for sustainability.
6.1. Economic Sustainability
Only few studies are reported about economic sustainability in Industry 4.0.
(Ghobakhloo) [142] found business model innovation and production efficiency are the
main function for industries to maintain economic sustainability in Industry 4.0. Braccini
and Margherita [143] found that improvement in economic sustainability affects the environmental
sustainability by improving resource efficiency and social sustainability by
higher taxes. It was noted that manufacturing organizations are using sensors in their
assembly lines for warehouse and inventory management which helps to improve economic
sustainability. Jamwal et al. [46] stated that in developing economies manufacturing
sustainability in Industry 4.0 depends on economic and political factors. A case study was
undertaken in the electronics manufacturing industry and found that social and economic
factors are the effect enablers while information technology, supply chain and environmental
related enablers are cause enablers for Industry 4.0 sustainability. Brozzi et al. [144]
concluded in a survey study that industries are now focusing more on economic sustainability
as compared to social and environmental sustainability. Müller and Voigt [145]
concluded that Industry 4.0 offers innovative business models which can help to achieve
economic sustainability as well as enhance competitiveness. Luthra et al. [146] stated
that managers should understand the need of Industry 4.0 adoption for the economic,
ecological and environmental benefits in emerging economies. Varela et al. [37] found that
the Industry 4.0 revolution will be more favorable for economic sustainability by reducing
manpower, energy consumption, lead time and improving productivity in manufacturing
processes. Stock and Seliger, and Jabbour et al. [3,9] found that Industry 4.0 practices
helps to reduce operational costs, improve circular economy, market share of products and
create new business model which enhance economic sustainability in industries. The main
influence of Industry 4.0 on economic sustainability is presented in Table 2.
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 16 of 27
Table 2. Influence of Industry 4.0 technologies on economic sustainability.
Sustainability
Dimension in I4.0 Main Influence from I4.0 References
Economic
Sustainable value creation, efficiency and profits [3,8,10,11,37]
Reduction in operational costs [4,8]
Impact on market share, supply chain, security [9,46,47,146]
New business model opportunities, turnover [3,4,8,48]
6.2. Social Sustainability
Economic sustainability in Industry 4.0 can be considered another paradox which
is generated by Industry 4.0 technologies. The basic requirement for the Industry 4.0 is
digitalization and automation in manufacturing activities [48]. The more automation in
industry will result in less manual labour. Introducing a new machine in the system will
affect certain jobs previously done by employees. These jobs include shop floor activities
and low-skilled jobs in industries which results in increasing unemployment [52]. It is true
that innovations in Industry 4.0 will generate new kinds of services and products in various
sectors. Employees needs to have flexible and keen learner to adapt the changes done by
fourth industrial revolution [43]. In the case of developed nations, the industries are already
working on their employee training from the long time which now has a skilled set of
labour which can adapt the Industry 4.0 environment. But, developing nations still require
a highly skilled set of labour which can perform tasks and adapt the changes arising from
Industry 4.0 technologies [46,47,146]. The new training models in industries should have a
focus on the development of the interdisciplinary skills that can increase the capabilities
of employees and make them ready to deal with the challenges in Industry 4.0. The new
technologies in Industry 4.0 generate a large amount of data which can be useful for the
future decision making and other operations such as predictive maintenance [53]. Workers
need to be skilled for these challenges so that they can manage this data and perform the
changes required in the organization. Most of the skillset required for Industry 4.0 is not
available in SMEs because there is no dedicated team in SMEs for Industry 4.0 activities.
These industries need to improve their skills through continuous innovation and training
by introducing new approaches in industries such as: (1) development in technical skills;
(2) virtual training programs; (3) user’s view-centered processes; (4) development in digital
and soft skills; (5) manufacturing systems; on which industries have been working for a
long time. The manufacturing systems in Industry 4.0 are highly flexible which need more
technical skills to deal with dynamic changes in market. To complete this requirement,
industries are collaborating with universities and research institutes to develop improved
education and training plans for their workers. Some studies found Education 4.0 will
be helpful to generate skilled labour in future for Industry 4.0. Our findings indicated
that there is limited research on theoretical and empirical investigations on the social
sustainability aspect of Industry 4.0. Therefore, we suggest that future studies need to
address the solution required to enhance the abilities and skills of workers with digital
manufacturing support. The main influence of Industry 4.0 on social sustainability is
presented in Table 3.
Table 3. Influence of Industry 4.0 technologies on social sustainability.
Sustainability
Dimension in I4.0 Main Influence from I4.0 References
Social
Employment [48]
Better collaboration among stakeholders [4,8]
Reduction in accidents [37,128]
Improved living conditions for societies [9,10,48]
Improved working conditions [3,9]
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 17 of 27
6.3. Environmental Sustainability
Due to strict government regulations and customer awareness, industries are now
focusing more on improving standards of living and environment-related issues. Environmental
sustainability can be considered one of the major pillars which contribute to the
sustainability in business practices [14]. The development in innovations and technology
are growing at a faster rate to improve the quality of life [8,10]. These developments are
not very sustainable because of a lack of proper knowledge about Industry 4.0 technologies
and their potentials [4]. Most of the developments in the environmental sustainability are
focused on the resource efficiency and climate issues. Industry 4.0 technologies consist
of cyber physical systems, intelligent sensors and smart logistics which have the potential
to reduce the energy, water and resource consumption in industry [39]. Additive
manufacturing technologies work on a pull strategy which has the potential to reduce
the inventory levels, lead times as well as complete the mass customized demands [44].
Industry 4.0 technologies require higher energy consumption as these technologies are
based on sensors, data centers and smart equipment which have a negative impact on
the environment during manufacturing operations [147]. Hazardous waste disposal and
greenhouse gases emissions are the major concern in the environmental sustainability [115].
During manufacturing, activities many scraps and other waste is generated which affect
both environmental and economic sustainability. There is a requirement for sustainable
processing and scheduling plans which can minimize the emissions and waste at the
machine level. However, few studies have addressed these research issues but they have
limitations and subjective to some constraints [47,148]. Hazardous chemical disposal may
lead to accidents which is the major concern in developing nations due to lack of standardized
technologies for Industry 4.0. Therefore, there is a need to develop new tools and
methods for detection and control of these type of issues in industries. The main influence
of Industry 4.0 on environmental sustainability is presented in Table 4.
Table 4. Influence of Industry 4.0 technologies on environmental sustainability.
Sustainability
Dimension in I4.0 Main Influence from I4.0 References
Environmental
Industrial waste reduction [3,47,149]
Promote circular economy [9,11]
Use and production of renewable sources [46,47,102]
Reduction in use of non-renewable sources and energy consumption [4,8,9]
Reduction in global warming, resource consumption, energy consumption [8,147]
RQ3: What are main research gaps in Industry 4.0 technologies for manufacturing
sustainability and what are the research issues that need to be addressed in future?
7. Future Research Directions
This section discusses the future research directions to achieve manufacturing sustainability
from Industry 4.0 technologies. From the literature review, six major research areas
are found which can be explored in future studies, discussed with research gaps below.
7.1. Lean Production Systems for Environment Management in Industry 4.0
Studies published on lean manufacturing state the benefits of lean production systems
in mass production [37,42]. These studies explain how lean manufacturing can help to
satisfy customer requirements. Ghobakhloo and Fathi [150] discuss the practical implications
of lean-enabled Industry 4.0 practices and stated some research scopes related to lean
enabled practices for small- and large-scale industries. Varela et al. [37] investigate the relationship
between lean practices and Industry 4.0 technologies and found that sustainability
pillars are strongly related to Industry 4.0. The studies on lean Industry 4.0 integration
are still limited. It would be more interesting to know the impact of lean manufacturing
practices from Industry 4.0 technologies. In future studies, an integrated lean-industry
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 18 of 27
4.0 framework can be proposed to enhance performance and minimize the waste from
manufacturing activities.
7.2. Establish Relationship between Sustainability and Industry 4.0 Factors
Most of the studies on Industry 4.0 are from developed nations which shows that
they are more focused on Industry 4.0. However, studies and adoption of Industry 4.0
is less in the developing nations due to technological advancements and resources required
for Industry 4.0 implementation. Studies conducted by Yadav et al.; Jamwal et al.;
Luthra et al. [46,47,146] discussed the research opportunities for Industry 4.0 technologies
to achieve sustainability by identifying influencing factors. Very few studies discuss the
relationship between sustainability and Industry 4.0 factors for business practices. Furthermore,
there is need to incorporate the factors related to political and risk-related factors.
The effect of these factors on sustainability is discussed by [151]. There is need to include
these factors with Industry 4.0 theories for the successful implementation of sustainability
practices in Industry 4.0 manufacturing. This will be helpful to provide a guideline
for emerging industry sectors. In future studies, hybrid multi-criteria decision-making
approaches, decision making in uncertainty and statistical tools can be used to find the
influence and relationship between the factors related to Industry 4.0 and sustainability.
7.3. Impact of Sustainable Supply Chain in Industry 4.0
Industry 4.0 technologies has created disruption in supply chains which forced the
manufacturing industries to rethink their supply chain design [146]. In the past few
years several new technologies have emerged which have altered traditional supply chain
practices. Now the industries are transforming their business models and adapting digital
supply chain models. Digitalization in the supply chain is aided by disruptive new
technologies such as big data analytics, AI, machine learning, automation, blockchain
and IoT [152]. Studies reported that digitalization in supply chains helps to lower the
operational costs by 30%, inventory requirements by 70% and lost sale opportunities by
60% [153–155]. In the digital transition of supply chain practices, long-term investments
and significant efforts are required. This will help to achieve operation effectiveness and
cost reduction in supply chain practices.
In future studies, the impact of sustainable supply chain on smart manufacturing,
remanufacturing, reverse logistics, and product cycling can be explored. However, in
blockchain-enabled supply chains, few studies have addressed environmental issues [152].
Table 5 presents the research issues and challenges for sustainable supply chains for
manufacturing sustainability.
Table 5. Research issues in sustainable supply chain practices in Industry 4.0 for manufacturing sustainability.
Category Research Issue References
Supply chain strategies for
Industry 4.0
How digital transformation is forcing manufacturing industries to rethink their
business models?
What is the relationship between Industry 4.0 technologies and supply
chain strategies?
What is the effect of supply chain digitalization on network value?
[23,24,50]
Supply chain orientation
in Industry 4.0
Role and benefits of sustainable supply chain management (SSCM) in Industry 4.0?
What are the benefits and drawbacks of technological infrastructure manufacturing
industries required for SSCM practices?
[4,8,23,50]
Customer value creation
What are the effects of data driven SSCM practices in Industry 4.0?
How Industry 4.0 technologies will help to implement SSCM in
manufacturing industries?
[3,50,154]
Human centric issues
in SSCM
What is role of human in digitalized supply chain network and practices?
How machine learning and AI based approaches can help to achieve sustainability
in SCM (supply chain management)?
[9,153,155]
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 19 of 27
7.4. Big Data Analytics and Sustainability
The use of big data analytics in manufacturing context offer several opportunities for
manufacturing industries in terms of production monitoring and real-time optimization
which contributes to sustainability.
Both IoT and big data analytics are the significant contributor in the development of
Industry 4.0. Big data analytics approaches are based on 3V (volume, variety and velocity)
which can handle large amounts of data and can be classified according to different lifecycle
stages [156]. Ren et al. [157] argued that big data analytics help to deal with the future
challenges related to smart manufacturing. In the last few years, advancements in big
data approaches have gained the attention of practitioners. Now, these approaches are
used by many industries to improve their services and maintenance operations. Wang and
Wang [49] found that manufacturing challenges in Industry 4.0 can be efficiently handled
by big data analytics due to its ability to handle large amount of data.
Future studies can be conducted to develop new big data analytics approaches to
achieve sustainability in manufacturing. There is a need to evaluate and analyze high
amount of data generated from the various stages of manufacturing processes. In future
studies, simulation and optimization techniques can be integrated data analytics which will
help to provide a better understanding of models for shop floor management. Studies related
to the development of IT-enabled big data analytics are also limited. In future studies,
the role of these architectures to achieve sustainability in manufacturing can be investigated.
Few studies have discussed big data analytics (BDA) opportunities for sustainable manufacturing
in which condition-based predictive maintenance issues discussed [158]. In this
area, future research studies can be conducted by considering the multicomponent-based
systems which is a limitation in most of the studies. Table 6 presents the research issues
and challenges for big data-enabled practices for manufacturing sustainability.
Table 6. Research issues in big data analytics in Industry 4.0 for manufacturing sustainability.
Future Research Challenge References
Architecture development for sustainable smart manufacturing (SSM) practices [6,89]
Data acquisition issues for SSM [24,50]
Data aggregation and integration issues [49,54]
Algorithms and model development for BDA enabled SSM practices [49,54,159]
Data quality management issues for SSM [160,161]
Role of cloud-based technologies for SSM [89]
Issues related to energy consumption and optimization [162]
7.5. Impact of Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence (AI) Approaches on Sustainability
The emergence of machine learning and AI approaches is shaping industrial sectors
and is expected to affect global productivity and environmental outcomes. AI and machine
learning have both a negative and positive impact on sustainable development [141].
Jamwal et al. [39] found that AI and machine learning approaches are helping industries to
achieve sustainability in manufacturing as well as Industry 4.0 implementation. Machine
learning approaches can be beneficial for manufacturing systems optimization, recovery
plans, and condition monitoring. Table 7 presents the research challenges for AI and
machine learning-enabled practices for manufacturing sustainability.
Table 7. Research issues in artificial intelligence (AI) and machine learning-enabled practices for manufacturing sustainability.
Future Research Challenge References
Development of integrated SM layouts by machine learning approaches [148]
What is impact of AI and machine learning approaches in Industry 4.0 from sustainability perspective [39]
Prediction modelling and condition-based monitoring issues [35,158]
AI and Machine learning based intelligent decision making [163,164]
Quality prediction issues [165,166]
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 20 of 27
7.6. Integrated Process Planning and Scheduling for Sustainability on the Shop Floor
Industry 4.0 on the shop floor level uses advanced technologies and complete automation
in which data can be transferred with the internet network. Industry 4.0 consists
of the key enabling technologies such as cyber physical systems which can work autonomously
and have self-optimization performance across the network. Optimization of
sub-components in manufacturing does not necessarily optimize the overall manufacturing
process [40]. There is a need for global optimization to achieve synergy in the entire
manufacturing system. Decisions in industries about what to produce, when and where to
produce it, fall in the domain of planning and scheduling [38]. Without an ability to make
decisions in manufacturing industries from the global point of view it is not possible to
experience the full benefits of Industry 4.0 practices. In the present time, global supply
chain practices require a new level of planning and scheduling sophistication which can
be termed “Planning and Scheduling 4.0”. Industry 4.0 technologies are transforming
manufacturing industries and driving the need for integrated planning and scheduling
systems which can support greater transparency, automation and integration. Opessa MLS
V7+ can be considered as the solution for the planning and scheduling 4.0.
Future research work can be conducted on how process planning and scheduling in
Industry 4.0 can contribute to sustainability (economic and environmental dimensions)
and resource efficiency. In the context of manufacturing sustainability, there are two major
elements: (1) inputs elements (raw materials, inventories and man-machine); (2) output
elements (pollution, scrap, waste and hazards). How can these elements be considered as
decision variables when computing the scheduling plans in reactive or predictive manner?
Scheduling in Industry 4.0 requires dynamic, efficient and decentralized decision methods.
In future studies, intelligent algorithms can be introduced to investigate the real-time
autonomous behavior of manufacturing systems. Innovative approaches and concepts
such as product service systems, intelligent products and cyber physical systems can be
used to develop efficient and effective sustainable scheduling plans.
7.7. Non-Destructive Quality Control for Manufacturing Sustainability
Industry 4.0 technologies are enhancing the non-destructive methods for quality control
in manufacturing which have a great impact on sustainability, safety and product quality.
Non-destructive testing in Industry 4.0 comprises all aspects including the inspection of raw
material to product delivery. Despite the development in non-destructive quality control in the
last few years, there are stillmany limitations related to skilled labour, complex user interfaces,
slowdata sharing processes and inspection speeds, and complicated data interpretationwhich
can be addressed in future studies. Some major research issues in non-destructive quality
control for manufacturing sustainability are as follows:
1. What are the main challenges and requirements for non-destructive testing in the
Industry 4.0 scenario?
2. Standardization of digital connections for non-destructive testingmethods in Industry 4.0.
3. Skill development and cost-related issues for non-destructive testing in the Industry
4.0 context.
These are some major issues which can be addressed in future studies.
8. Conclusions
In the present study role of Industry 4.0 technologies to achieve manufacturing sustainability
is discussed. The present study aimed to identify the current research progress
in Industry 4.0 and sustainability by using a systematic literature review approach. In the
study, a SLR was performed on three well-regarded digital scientific databases i.e., IEEE,
Web of Science and Scopus. A total of 127 articles were selected after screening for review.
The role of different key enabling technologies for Industry 4.0 was discussed in detail.
The results indicate that manufacturing sustainability can be enhanced with Industry 4.0
technologies. The research in Industry 4.0 and manufacturing sustainability have several
new scopes.
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 21 of 27
In the literature it is found that the majority of studies focused on a general discussion
about the Industry 4.0 concepts and theories. However, very few studies discuss the role of
shop floor activities and different technologies for achieving manufacturing sustainability.
In shop floor management, case studies and simulation approaches were used to validate
the proposed architectures. There is lack of studies on planning and scheduling which can
contribute to achieve manufacturing sustainability.
As a new service-oriented and network-based manufacturing paradigm, manufacturing
sustainability has experienced rapid advancement and development in the last
few years. Within the SM system, the emerging key enabling technologies of Industry 4.0
such as blockchain, big data, AI, machine learning and IoT are being increasingly used by
industries to capture and analyze data in different life-cycles of products. Consequently, a
large amount of data is available and used for decision making in life-cycle management
with BDA. The literature review revealed that Industry 4.0 has a significant impact on
the manufacturing sustainability in different stages. However, research in this area is still
limited. To address these research limitations, authors have provided insights for future
research work in different areas. The following significant contributions are from this SLR:
 This study discusses the role and opportunities for Industry 4.0 technologies for
various manufacturing operations in industries. The previous published studies
were limited to the general concepts related to Industry 4.0 theories and concepts.
The role and opportunities for shop floor management in Industry 4.0 are discussed.
Furthermore, this study provides the impact of various Industry 4.0 technologies on
each sustainability dimension which will be helpful for future studies.
 Secondly, this study uses the three major scientific databases i.e., IEEE explore, Scopus
and Web of science, for the literature collection which was the limitation in previously
published studies. This study followed the PRISMA approach for a systematic
literature review and, on the basis of final articles, different opportunities for the
manufacturing sustainability with Industry 4.0 technologies are discussed.
 Finally, from the literature review various research issues and challenges in Industry
4.0 were identified which can be explored in the future studies.
Both industry and academics leaders will obtain insights from the findings of this
study. Future studies should be focused on the framework development with the different
Industry 4.0 technologies to achieve sustainability in both large enterprises and small
enterprises. In addition, areas like lean production in Industry 4.0 and the role of AI and
machine learning for manufacturing sustainability can be explored.
Author Contributions: Conceptualization, A.J. and A.G.; methodology, A.J.; software, A.J.; validation,
R.A., M.S. and A.G.; formal analysis, R.A., M.S. and A.G.; investigation, R.A.; resources, M.S.
and A.G.; writing—original draft preparation, A.J.; writing—review and editing, A.J.; visualization,
A.J.; supervision, R.A., M.S. and A.G.; project administration, A.G.; funding acquisition, A.G. All
authors have read and agreed to the published version of the manuscript.
Funding: This research received no external funding.
Institutional Review Board Statement: Not applicable.
Informed Consent Statement: Not applicable.
Data Availability Statement: Not applicable.
Conflicts of Interest: The authors declare no conflict of interest.
References
1. Aiello, G.; Giallanza, A.; Vacante, S.; Fasoli, S.; Mascarella, G. Propulsion Monitoring System for Digitized Ship Management:
Preliminary Results from a Case Study. Procedia Manuf. 2020, 42, 16–23. [CrossRef]
2. Oztemel, E.; Gursev, S. Literature Review of Industry 4.0 and Related Technologies. J. Intell. Manuf. 2020, 31, 127–182. [CrossRef]
3. Stock, T.; Seliger, G. Opportunities of Sustainable Manufacturing in Industry 4.0. In Procedia CIRP, Proceedings of the 13th Global
Conference on Sustainable Manufacturing—Decoupling Growth from Resource Use, Binh Duong, Vietnam, 16–18 September 2016; Seliger,
G., Malon, J., Kohl, H., Eds.; Elsevier B.V.: Amsterdam, The Netherlands, 2016; Volume 40, pp. 536–541.
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 22 of 27
4. Machado, C.G.; Winroth, M.P.; Ribeiro da Silva, E.H.D. Sustainable Manufacturing in Industry 4.0: An Emerging Research
Agenda. Int. J. Prod. Res. 2020, 58, 1462–1484. [CrossRef]
5. Zhong, R.Y.; Xu, X.; Klotz, E.; Newman, S.T. Intelligent Manufacturing in the Context of Industry 4.0: A Review. Engineering 2017,
3, 616–630. [CrossRef]
6. Kim, J.H. A Review of Cyber-Physical System Research Relevant to the Emerging IT Trends: Industry 4.0, IoT, Big Data, and
Cloud Computing. J. Ind. Integr. Manag. 2017, 2, 1750011. [CrossRef]
7. Ejsmont, K.; Gladysz, B.; Kluczek, A. Impact of Industry 4.0 on Sustainability-Bibliometric Literature Review. Sustainability 2020,
12, 5650. [CrossRef]
8. Sharma, R.; Jabbour, C.J.C.; Lopes de Sousa Jabbour, A.B. Sustainable Manufacturing and Industry 4.0: What We Know and What
We Don’t. J. Enterp. Inf. Manag. 2020. [CrossRef]
9. De Sousa Jabbour, A.B.L.; Jabbour, C.J.C.; Foropon, C.; Filho, M.G. When Titans Meet—Can Industry 4.0 Revolutionise the
Environmentally-Sustainable ManufacturingWave? The Role of Critical Success Factors. Technol. Forecast. Soc. Change 2018, 132,
18–25. [CrossRef]
10. Kamble, S.S.; Gunasekaran, A.; Gawankar, S.A. Sustainable Industry 4.0 Framework: A Systematic Literature Review Identifying
the Current Trends and Future Perspectives. Process. Saf. Environ. Prot. 2018, 117, 408–425. [CrossRef]
11. Bag, S.; Pretorius, J.H.C. Relationships between Industry 4.0, Sustainable Manufacturing and Circular Economy: Proposal of a
Research Framework. Int. J. Organ. Anal. 2020. [CrossRef]
12. Haapala, K.R.; Zhao, F.; Camelio, J.; Sutherland, J.W.; Skerlos, S.J.; Dornfeld, D.A.; Jawahir, I.S.; Clarens, A.F.; Rickli, J.L. A Review
of Engineering Research in Sustainable Manufacturing. J. Manuf. Sci. Eng. Trans. ASME 2013, 135. [CrossRef]
13. Garetti, M.; Taisch, M. Sustainable Manufacturing: Trends and Research Challenges. Prod. Plan. Control. 2012, 23, 83–104.
[CrossRef]
14. Jayal, A.D.; Badurdeen, F.; Dillon, O.W., Jr.; Jawahir, I.S. Sustainable Manufacturing: Modeling and Optimization Challenges at
the Product, Process and System Levels. CIRP J. Manuf. Sci. Technol. 2010, 2, 144–152. [CrossRef]
15. ITA, U. How Does Commerce Define Sustainable Manufacturing? 2012. Available online: https://oneill.indiana.edu/doc/
research/sustainability-2014.pdf (accessed on 17 May 2021).
16. Sartal, A.; Bellas, R.; Mejías, A.M.; García-Collado, A. The Sustainable Manufacturing Concept, Evolution and Opportunities
within Industry 4.0: A Literature Review. Adv. Mech. Eng. 2020, 12. [CrossRef]
17. McElnea,W.K. Sustainable Manufacturing Initiative: U.S. Department of Commerce. Int. J. Powder Metall. Princet. N. J. 2011, 47,
12–16.
18. Giallanza, A.; Aiello, G.; Marannano, G.; Nigrelli, V. Industry 4.0: Smart Test Bench for Shipbuilding Industry. Int. J. Interact. Des.
Manuf. IJIDeM 2020, 14, 1525–1533. [CrossRef]
19. Borregan-Alvarado, J.; Alvarez-Meaza, I.; Cilleruelo-Carrasco, E.; Garechana-Anacabe, G. A Bibliometric Analysis in Industry 4.0
and Advanced Manufacturing: What about the Sustainable Supply Chain? Sustainability 2020, 12, 7840. [CrossRef]
20. Giallanza, A.; Aiello, G.; Marannano, G. Industry 4.0: Advanced Digital Solutions Implemented on a Close Power Loop Test
Bench. Procedia Comput. Sci. 2021, 180, 93–101. [CrossRef]
21. Lee, J.; Azamfar, M.; Singh, J. A Blockchain Enabled Cyber-Physical System Architecture for Industry 4.0 Manufacturing Systems.
Manuf. Lett. 2019, 20, 34–39. [CrossRef]
22. Thramboulidis, K.; Vachtsevanou, D.C.; Kontou, I. CPuS-IoT: A Cyber-Physical Microservice and IoT-Based Framework for
Manufacturing Assembly Systems. Annu. Rev. Control 2019, 47, 237–248. [CrossRef]
23. Abdirad, M.; Krishnan, K. Industry 4.0 in Logistics and Supply Chain Management: A Systematic Literature Review. EMJ Eng.
Manag. J. 2020, 1–15. [CrossRef]
24. Chalmeta, R.; Santos-deLeón, N.J. Sustainable Supply Chain in the Era of Industry 4.0 and Big Data: A Systematic Analysis of
Literature and Research. Sustainability 2020, 12, 4108. [CrossRef]
25. Moher, D.; Shamseer, L.; Clarke, M.; Ghersi, D.; Liberati, A.; Petticrew, M.; Shekelle, P.; Stewart, L.A. Preferred Reporting Items
for Systematic Review and Meta-Analysis Protocols (PRISMA-P) 2015 Statement. Syst. Rev. 2015, 4, 1–9. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
26. Petticrew, M. Systematic Reviews from Astronomy to Zoology: Myths and Misconceptions. BMJ 2001, 322, 98–101. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
27. Korner, M.E.H.; Lambán, M.P.; Albajez, J.A.; Santolaria, J.; Corrales, L.C.N.; Royo, J. Systematic Literature Review: Integration of
Additive Manufacturing and Industry 4.0. Metals 2020, 10, 1061. [CrossRef]
28. Samala, T.; Manupati, V.K.; Varela, M.L.R.; Putnik, G. Investigation of Degradation and Upgradation Models for Flexible Unit
Systems: A Systematic Literature Review. Future Internet 2021, 13, 57. [CrossRef]
29. Antony, J.; Psomas, E.; Garza-Reyes, J.A.; Hines, P. Practical Implications and Future Research Agenda of Lean Manufacturing: A
Systematic Literature Review. Prod. Plan. Control 2020, 1–37. [CrossRef]
30. Müller, J.M.; Kiel, D.; Voigt, K.-I. What Drives the Implementation of Industry 4.0? The Role of Opportunities and Challenges in
the Context of Sustainability. Sustainability 2018, 10, 247. [CrossRef]
31. Kiel, D.; Müller, J.M.; Arnold, C.; Voigt, K.-I. Sustainable Industrial Value Creation: Benefits and Challenges of Industry 4.0. Int. J.
Innov. Manag. 2017, 21. [CrossRef]
32. Luthra, S.; Mangla, S.K. Evaluating Challenges to Industry 4.0 Initiatives for Supply Chain Sustainability in Emerging Economies.
Process Saf. Environ. Prot. 2018, 117, 168–179. [CrossRef]
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 23 of 27
33. Manavalan, E.; Jayakrishna, K. A Review of Internet of Things (IoT) Embedded Sustainable Supply Chain for Industry 4.0
Requirements. Comput. Ind. Eng. 2019, 127, 925–953. [CrossRef]
34. Aiello, G.; Giallanza, A.; Mascarella, G. Towards Shipping 4.0. A Preliminary Gap Analysis. Procedia Manuf. 2020, 42, 24–29.
[CrossRef]
35. Cica, D.; Sredanovic, B.; Tesic, S.; Kramar, D. Predictive Modeling of Turning Operations under Different Cooling/Lubricating
Conditions for Sustainable Manufacturing with Machine Learning Techniques. Appl. Comput. Inform. 2020. [CrossRef]
36. Pickard, M.; Grecu, I.; Grecu, G. Sustainable Smart Manufacturing in Industry 4.0: Real-Time Resource Planning, Process
Monitoring, and Production Control. Econ. Manag. Financ. Mark. 2019, 14, 30–36. [CrossRef]
37. Varela, L.; Araújo, A.; Ávila, P.; Castro, H.; Putnik, G. Evaluation of the Relation between Lean Manufacturing, Industry 4.0, and
Sustainability. Sustainability 2019, 11, 1439. [CrossRef]
38. Yang,W.; Takakuwa, S. Simulation-Based Dynamic Shop Floor Scheduling for a Flexible Manufacturing System in the Industry
4.0 Environment. In Proceedings of the 2017 Winter Simulation Conference, Las Vegas, NV, USA, 3–6 December 2017; IEEE: New York,
NY, USA, 2017; pp. 3908–3916.
39. Jamwal, A.; Agrawal, R.; Sharma, M.; Kumar, A.; Kumar, V.; Garza-Reyes, J.A.A. Machine Learning Applications for Sustainable
Manufacturing: A Bibliometric-Based Review for Future Research. J. Enterp. Inf. Manag. 2021. [CrossRef]
40. Moica, S.; Ganzarain, J.; Ibarra, D.; Ferencz, P. ChangeMade in Shop FloorManagement to Transform a Conventional Production
System into an “Industry 4.0”: Case Studies in SME Automotive ProductionManufacturing. In Proceedings of the 7th International
Conference on Industrial Technology and Management (ICITM 2018), Oxford, UK, 7–9 March 2018; IEEE: New York, NY, USA, 2018;
pp. 51–56.
41. Mittal, S.; Romero, D.; Wuest, T. Towards a Smart Manufacturing Toolkit for SMEs. Prod. Lifecycle Manag. Support. Ind. 4.0. 2018,
476–487. [CrossRef]
42. Schmidt, D.; Villalba Diez, J.; Ordieres-Meré, J.; Gevers, R.; Schwiep, J.; Molina, M. Industry 4.0 Lean Shopfloor Management
Characterization Using EEG Sensors and Deep Learning. Sensors 2020, 20, 2860. [CrossRef]
43. Godina, R.; Ribeiro, I.; Matos, F.; Ferreira, B.T.; Carvalho, H.; Peças, P. Impact Assessment of Additive Manufacturing on
Sustainable Business Models in Industry 4.0 Context. Sustainability 2020, 12, 66. [CrossRef]
44. Haleem, A.; Javaid, M. Additive Manufacturing Applications in Industry 4.0: A Review. J. Ind. Integr. Manag. 2019, 4, 1930001.
[CrossRef]
45. Ford, S.; Despeisse, M. Additive Manufacturing and Sustainability: An Exploratory Study of the Advantages and Challenges. J.
Clean. Prod. 2016, 137, 1573–1587. [CrossRef]
46. Jamwal, A.; Agrawal, R.; Sharma, M.; Kumar, V.; Kumar, S. Developing A Sustainability Framework for Industry 4.0. Procedia
CIRP 2021, 98, 430–435. [CrossRef]
47. Yadav, G.; Kumar, A.; Luthra, S.; Garza-Reyes, J.A.; Kumar, V.; Batista, L. A Framework to Achieve Sustainability in Manufacturing
Organisations of Developing Economies Using Industry 4.0 Technologies’ Enablers. Comput. Ind. 2020, 122. [CrossRef]
48. Mittal, S.; Khan, M.A.; Romero, D.; Wuest, T. A Critical Review of Smart Manufacturing & Industry 4.0 Maturity Models:
Implications for Small and Medium-Sized Enterprises (SMEs). J. Manuf. Syst. 2018, 49, 194–214.
49. Wang, L.; Wang, G. Big Data in Cyber-Physical Systems, Digital Manufacturing and Industry 4.0. Int. J. Eng. Manuf. IJEM 2016, 6,
1–8.
50. Addo-Tenkorang, R.; Helo, P.T. Big Data Applications in Operations/Supply-Chain Management: A Literature Review. Comput.
Ind. Eng. 2016, 101, 528–543. [CrossRef]
51. Castelo-Branco, I.; Cruz-Jesus, F.; Oliveira, T. Assessing Industry 4.0 Readiness in Manufacturing: Evidence for the European
Union. Comput. Ind. 2019, 107, 22–32. [CrossRef]
52. Frank, A.G.; Dalenogare, L.S.; Ayala, N.F. Industry 4.0 Technologies: Implementation Patterns in Manufacturing Companies. Int.
J. Prod. Econ. 2019, 210, 15–26. [CrossRef]
53. Papadopoulos, T.; Singh, S.P.; Spanaki, K.; Gunasekaran, A.; Dubey, R. Towards the next Generation of Manufacturing: Implications
of Big Data and Digitalization in the Context of Industry 4.0. Prod. Plan. Control. 2021. [CrossRef]
54. Li, D.; Tang, H.;Wang, S.; Liu, C. A Big Data Enabled Load-Balancing Control for Smart Manufacturing of Industry 4.0. Clust.
Comput. 2017, 20, 1855–1864. [CrossRef]
55. Tao, F.; Qi, Q.;Wang, L.; Nee, A.Y.C. Digital Twins and Cyber–Physical Systems toward Smart Manufacturing and Industry 4.0:
Correlation and Comparison. Engineering 2019, 5, 653–661. [CrossRef]
56. Ke, S.; Xiang, F.; Zhang, Z.; Zuo, Y. A Enhanced Interaction Framework Based on VR, AR and MR in Digital Twin. Procedia Cirp
2019, 83, 753–758. [CrossRef]
57. Wang, X.V.;Wang, L. Digital Twin-Based WEEE Recycling, Recovery and Remanufacturing in the Background of Industry 4.0. Int.
J. Prod. Res. 2019, 57, 3892–3902. [CrossRef]
58. Lee, J.; Davari, H.; Singh, J.; Pandhare, V. Industrial Artificial Intelligence for Industry 4.0-Based Manufacturing Systems. Manuf.
Lett. 2018, 18, 20–23. [CrossRef]
59. Ayvaz, S.; Alpay, K. Predictive maintenance system for production lines in manufacturing: A machine learning approach using
IoT data in real-time. Expert Syst. Appl. 2021, 173, 114598. [CrossRef]
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 24 of 27
60. Yao, X.; Zhou, J.; Zhang, J.; Boër, C.R. From Intelligent Manufacturing to Smart Manufacturing for Industry 4.0 Driven by next
Generation Artificial Intelligence and Further On. In Proceedings of the 2017 5th International Conference on Enterprise Systems (ES),
Beijing, China, 22–24 September 2017; IEEE: New York, NY, USA, 2017; pp. 311–318.
61. Bajic, B.; Cosic, I.; Lazarevic, M.; Sremcev, N.; Rikalovic, A. Machine Learning Techniques for Smart Manufacturing: Applications
and Challenges in Industry 4.0. In Proceedings of the 9th International Scientific and Expert Conference, Novi Sad, Serbia, 10-12
October 2018; p. 29.
62. Cioffi, R.; Travaglioni, M.; Piscitelli, G.; Petrillo, A.; De Felice, F. Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning Applications in
Smart Production: Progress, Trends, and Directions. Sustainability 2020, 12, 492. [CrossRef]
63. Angelopoulos, A.; Michailidis, E.T.; Nomikos, N.; Trakadas, P.; Hatziefremidis, A.; Voliotis, S.; Zahariadis, T. Tackling Faults in
the Industry 4.0 Era—a Survey of Machine-Learning Solutions and Key Aspects. Sensors 2020, 20, 109. [CrossRef]
64. Çınar, Z.M.; Abdussalam Nuhu, A.; Zeeshan, Q.; Korhan, O.; Asmael, M.; Safaei, B. Machine Learning in Predictive Maintenance
towards Sustainable Smart Manufacturing in Industry 4.0. Sustainability 2020, 12, 8211. [CrossRef]
65. Candanedo, I.S.; Nieves, E.H.; González, S.R.; Martín, M.T.S.; Briones, A.G. Machine Learning Predictive Model for Industry 4.0;
Springer: Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2018; pp. 501–510.
66. Psarommatis, F.; May, G.; Dreyfus, P.-A.; Kiritsis, D. Zero Defect Manufacturing: State-of-the-Art Review, Shortcomings and
Future Directions in Research. Int. J. Prod. Res. 2020, 58, 1–17. [CrossRef]
67. Huang, Z.; Angadi, V.C.; Danishvar, M.; Mousavi, A.; Li, M. Zero Defect Manufacturing of Microsemiconductors—An Application
of Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence. In Proceedings of the 2018 5th International Conference on Systems and Informatics
(ICSAI), Nanjing, China, 10–18 November 2018; IEEE: New York, NY, USA, 2018; pp. 449–454.
68. Lindström, J.; Kyösti, P.; Birk, W.; Lejon, E. An Initial Model for Zero Defect Manufacturing. Appl. Sci. 2020, 10, 4570. [CrossRef]
69. Eger, F.; Coupek, D.; Caputo, D.; Colledani, M.; Penalva, M.; Ortiz, J.A.; Freiberger, H.; Kollegger, G. Zero Defect Manufacturing
Strategies for Reduction of Scrap and Inspection Effort inMulti-Stage Production Systems. Procedia CIRP 2018, 67, 368–373. [CrossRef]
70. Psarommatis, F.; Vuichard, M.; Kiritsis, D. Improved Heuristics Algorithms for Re-Scheduling Flexible Job Shops in the Era of
Zero Defect Manufacturing. Procedia Manuf. 2020, 51, 1485–1490. [CrossRef]
71. Saqlain, M.; Piao, M.; Shim, Y.; Lee, J.Y. Framework of an IoT-Based Industrial Data Management for Smart Manufacturing. J.
Sens. Actuator Netw. 2019, 8, 25. [CrossRef]
72. Islam, M.M.; AlGeddawy, T. The Industrial Internet of Things Models, Challenges and Opportunities in Sustainable Manufacturing.
In Proceedings of the 39th International Annual Conference of the American Society for Engineering Management, ASEM 2018:
Bridging the Gap Between Engineering and Business, Coeur D’Alene, ID, USA, 17–20 October 2018; American Society for Engineering
Management: Huntsville, AL, USA, 2018; pp. 122–131.
73. Belli, L.; Davoli, L.; Medioli, A.; Marchini, P.L.; Ferrari, G. Toward Industry 4.0 with IoT: Optimizing Business Processes in an
Evolving Manufacturing Factory. Front. ICT 2019, 6, 17. [CrossRef]
74. Wan, J.; Chen, B.; Imran, M.; Tao, F.; Li, D.; Liu, C.; Ahmad, S. Toward Dynamic Resources Management for IoT-Based
Manufacturing. IEEE Commun. Mag. 2018, 56, 52–59. [CrossRef]
75. Gerrikagoitia, J.K.; Unamuno, G.; Urkia, E.; Serna, A. Digital Manufacturing Platforms in the Industry 4.0 from Private and Public
Perspectives. Appl. Sci. 2019, 9, 2934. [CrossRef]
76. Xu, L.D.; Xu, E.L.; Li, L. Industry 4.0: State of the Art and Future Trends. Int. J. Prod. Res. 2018, 56, 2941–2962. [CrossRef]
77. Beier, G.; Ullrich, A.; Niehoff, S.; Reißig, M.; Habich, M. Industry 4.0: How It Is Defined from a Sociotechnical Perspective and
How Much Sustainability It Includes—A Literature Review. J. Clean. Prod. 2020, 259. [CrossRef]
78. Singh, R.; Bhanot, N. An Integrated DEMATEL-MMDE-ISM Based Approach for Analysing the Barriers of IoT Implementation in
the Manufacturing Industry. Int. J. Prod. Res. 2020, 58, 2454–2476. [CrossRef]
79. Xu, X. From Cloud Computing to Cloud Manufacturing. Robot. Comput. Integr. Manuf. 2012, 28, 75–86. [CrossRef]
80. Caggiano, A. Cloud-Based Manufacturing Process Monitoring for Smart Diagnosis Services. Int. J. Comput. Integr. Manuf. 2018,
31, 612–623. [CrossRef]
81. Li, B.-H.; Zhang, L.; Ren, L.; Chai, X.-D.; Tao, F.; Wang, Y.-Z.; Yin, C.; Huang, P.; Zhao, X.-P.; Zhou, Z.-D. Typical Characteristics,
Technologies and Applications of Cloud Manufacturing. Comput. Integr. Manuf. Syst. 2012, 18, 1345–1356.
82. Adamson, G.; Wang, L.; Holm, M.; Moore, P. Cloud Manufacturing–a Critical Review of Recent Development and Future Trends.
Int. J. Comput. Integr. Manuf. 2017, 30, 347–380. [CrossRef]
83. Liu, Y.;Wang, L.;Wang, X.V.; Xu, X.; Zhang, L. Scheduling in Cloud Manufacturing: State-of-the-Art and Research Challenges.
Int. J. Prod. Res. 2019, 57, 4854–4879. [CrossRef]
84. Tao, F.; Zhang, L.; Venkatesh, V.; Luo, Y.; Cheng, Y. Cloud Manufacturing: A Computing and Service-Oriented Manufacturing
Model. Proc. Inst. Mech. Eng. Part. B J. Eng. Manuf. 2011, 225, 1969–1976. [CrossRef]
85. Liu, Y.;Wang, L.;Wang, X.V.; Xu, X.; Jiang, P. Cloud Manufacturing: Key Issues and Future Perspectives. Int. J. Comput. Integr.
Manuf. 2019, 32, 858–874. [CrossRef]
86. Wu, D.; Greer, M.J.; Rosen, D.W.; Schaefer, D. Cloud Manufacturing: Strategic Vision and State-of-the-Art. J. Manuf. Syst. 2013, 32,
564–579. [CrossRef]
87. Coronado, P.D.U.; Lynn, R.; Louhichi, W.; Parto, M.; Wescoat, E.; Kurfess, T. Part Data Integration in the Shop Floor Digital Twin:
Mobile and Cloud Technologies to Enable a Manufacturing Execution System. J. Manuf. Syst. 2018, 48, 25–33. [CrossRef]
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 25 of 27
88. Varela, M.L.; Putnik, G.D.; Manupati, V.K.; Rajyalakshmi, G.; Trojanowska, J.; Machado, J. Collaborative Manufacturing Based on
Cloud, and on Other I4. 0 Oriented Principles and Technologies: A Systematic Literature Review and Reflections. Manag. Prod.
Eng. Rev. 2018, 9, 90–99.
89. Lu, Y.; Xu, X. Cloud-Based Manufacturing Equipment and Big Data Analytics to Enable on-Demand Manufacturing Services.
Robot. Comput. Integr. Manuf. 2019, 57, 92–102. [CrossRef]
90. Mubarok, K.; Xu, X.; Ye, X.; Zhong, R.Y.; Lu, Y. Manufacturing Service Reliability Assessment in Cloud Manufacturing. Procedia
CIRP 2018, 72, 940–946. [CrossRef]
91. Fisher, O.;Watson, N.; Porcu, L.; Bacon, D.; Rigley, M.; Gomes, R.L. Cloud Manufacturing as a Sustainable Process Manufacturing
Route. J. Manuf. Syst. 2018, 47, 53–68. [CrossRef]
92. Bottani, E.; Vignali, G. Augmented Reality Technology in the Manufacturing Industry: A Review of the Last Decade. IISE Trans.
2019, 51, 284–310. [CrossRef]
93. Damiani, L.; Revetria, R.; Morra, E. Safety in Industry 4.0: The Multi-Purpose Applications of Augmented Reality in Digital
Factories. Adv. Sci. Technol. Eng. Syst. 2020, 5, 248–253. [CrossRef]
94. Lai, Z.-H.; Tao, W.; Leu, M.C.; Yin, Z. Smart Augmented Reality Instructional System for Mechanical Assembly towards
Worker-Centered Intelligent Manufacturing. J. Manuf. Syst. 2020, 55, 69–81. [CrossRef]
95. Nabati, E.; Nieto, M.A.; Decker, A.; Thoben, K.-D. Application of Virtual Reality Technologies for Achieving Energy Efficient Manufacturing:
Literature Analysis and Findings; Springer: Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2020; pp. 479–486.
96. Shiba, Y.; Imai, S. Development of Engineering Educational Support System for Manufacturing Using Augmented Reality; IEEE: New
York, NY, USA, 2020; pp. 198–202.
97. Lee, H. Real-Time Manufacturing Modeling and Simulation Framework Using Augmented Reality and Stochastic Network
Analysis. Virtual Real. 2019, 23, 85–99. [CrossRef]
98. Rumsey, A.; Le Dantec, C.A. Manufacturing Change: The Impact of Virtual Environments on Real Organizations. In Proceedings
of the CHI ’20: CHI Conference on Human Factors in Computing Systems, Honolulu, HI, USA, 25–30 April 2020; pp. 1–12.
99. Mittal, S.; Khan, M.A.; Romero, D.; Wuest, T. Smart Manufacturing: Characteristics, Technologies and Enabling Factors. Proc. Inst.
Mech. Eng. Part B J. Eng. Manuf. 2019, 233, 1342–1361. [CrossRef]
100. Malik, A.A.; Masood, T.; Bilberg, A. Virtual Reality in Manufacturing: Immersive and Collaborative Artificial-Reality in Design of
Human-Robot Workspace. Int. J. Comput. Integr. Manuf. 2020, 33, 22–37. [CrossRef]
101. Mandic, V. Model-Based Manufacturing System Supported by Virtual Technologies in an Industry 4.0 Context; Springer:
Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2020; pp. 215–226.
102. Leng, J.; Ruan, G.; Jiang, P.; Xu, K.; Liu, Q.; Zhou, X.; Liu, C. Blockchain-Empowered Sustainable Manufacturing and Product
Lifecycle Management in Industry 4.0: A Survey. Renew. Sustain. Energy Rev. 2020, 132. [CrossRef]
103. Li, Z.; Barenji, A.V.; Huang, G.Q. Toward a Blockchain Cloud Manufacturing System as a Peer to Peer Distributed Network
Platform. Robot. Comput. Integr. Manuf. 2018, 54, 133–144. [CrossRef]
104. Westerkamp, M.; Victor, F.; Küpper, A. Tracing Manufacturing Processes Using Blockchain-Based Token Compositions. Digit.
Commun. Netw. 2020, 6, 167–176. [CrossRef]
105. Lohmer, J.; Lasch, R. Blockchain in Operations Management and Manufacturing: Potential and Barriers. Comput. Ind. Eng. 2020,
149, 106789. [CrossRef]
106. Ko, T.; Lee, J.; Ryu, D. Blockchain Technology and Manufacturing Industry: Real-Time Transparency and Cost Savings. Sustainability
2018, 10, 4274. [CrossRef]
107. Yu, C.; Zhang, L.; Zhao, W.; Zhang, S. A Blockchain-Based Service Composition Architecture in Cloud Manufacturing. Int. J.
Comput. Integr. Manuf. 2020, 33, 701–715. [CrossRef]
108. Aghamohammadzadeh, E.; Fatahi Valilai, O. A Novel Cloud Manufacturing Service Composition Platform Enabled by Blockchain
Technology. Int. J. Prod. Res. 2020, 58, 5280–5298. [CrossRef]
109. Zhang, Y.; Xu, X.; Liu, A.; Lu, Q.; Xu, L.; Tao, F. Blockchain-Based Trust Mechanism for IoT-Based Smart Manufacturing System.
IEEE Trans. Comput. Soc. Syst. 2019, 6, 1386–1394. [CrossRef]
110. Yu, C.; Jiang, X.; Yu, S.; Yang, C. Blockchain-Based Shared Manufacturing in Support of Cyber Physical Systems: Concept,
Framework, and Operation. Robot. Comput. Integr. Manuf. 2020, 64, 101931. [CrossRef]
111. Tao, F.; Zhang, Y.; Cheng, Y.; Ren, J.; Wang, D.; Qi, Q.; Li, P. Digital Twin and Blockchain Enhanced Smart Manufacturing Service
Collaboration and Management. J. Manuf. Syst. 2020. [CrossRef]
112. Barenji, A.V.; Li, Z.;Wang,W.M. Blockchain Cloud Manufacturing: Shop Floor and Machine Level. In Proceedings of the Smart
SysTech 2018; European Conference on Smart Objects, Systems and Technologies, Dresden, Germany, 12–13 June 2018; VDE: Berlin,
Germany, 2018; pp. 1–6.
113. Ouyang, L.; Yuan, Y.; Wang, F.-Y. A Blockchain-Based Framework for Collaborative Production in Distributed and Social
Manufacturing. In Proceedings of the IEEE International Conference on Service Operations and Logistics, and Informatics, SOLI,
Zhengzhou, China, 11–13 October 2019; IEEE: New York, NY, USA, 2019; pp. 76–81.
114. Touzout, F.A.; Benyoucef, L. Multi-Objective Sustainable Process Plan Generation in a Reconfigurable Manufacturing Environment:
Exact and Adapted Evolutionary Approaches. Int. J. Prod. Res. 2019, 57, 2531–2547. [CrossRef]
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 26 of 27
115. Khezri, A.; Benderbal, H.H.; Benyoucef, L. A Sustainable Reconfigurable Manufacturing System Designing with Focus on
Environmental Hazardous Wastes. In Proceedings of the IEEE International Conference on Emerging Technologies and Factory
Automation, ETFA, Zaragoza, Spain, 10–13 September 2019; Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers Inc.: New York, NY,
USA, 2019; Volume 2019-Septe, pp. 317–324.
116. Alcácer, V.; Cruz-Machado, V. Scanning the Industry 4.0: A Literature Review on Technologies for Manufacturing Systems. Eng.
Sci. Technol. Int. J. 2019, 22, 899–919. [CrossRef]
117. Vaidya, S.; Ambad, P.; Bhosle, S. Industry 4.0—A Glimpse. Procedia Manuf. 2018, 20, 233–238. [CrossRef]
118. Long, F.; Zeiler, P.; Bertsche, B. Modelling the Flexibility of Production Systems in Industry 4.0 for Analysing Their Productivity
and Availability with High-Level Petri Nets. IFAC Pap. 2017, 50, 5680–5687. [CrossRef]
119. Suzi´c, N.; Forza, C.; Trentin, A.; Aniši´c, Z. Implementation Guidelines for Mass Customization: Current Characteristics and
Suggestions for Improvement. Prod. Plan. Control 2018, 29, 856–871. [CrossRef]
120. Wang, Y.; Ma, H.-S.; Yang, J.-H.; Wang, K.-S. Industry 4.0: A Way from Mass Customization to Mass Personalization Production.
Adv. Manuf. 2017, 5, 311–320. [CrossRef]
121. Khalil, T.; Olivia, P.; Thierno, M.D.; Romdhane, B.K.; Noureddine, B.Y.; Jean-Yves, C. Model Based Systems Engineering Approach
for the Improvement of Manufacturing System Flexibility. In Proceedings of the International Workshop on Research and Education in
Mechatronics (REM), Cracow, Poland, 10 December 2020; IEEE: New York, NY, USA, 2020; pp. 1–6.
122. Florescu, A.; Barabas, S.A. Modeling and Simulation of a Flexible Manufacturing System—A Basic Component of Industry 4.0.
Appl. Sci. 2020, 10, 8300. [CrossRef]
123. Luscinski, S.; Ivanov, V. A Simulation Study of Industry 4.0 Factories Based on the Ontology on Flexibility with Using FlexSimr
Software. Manag. Prod. Eng. Rev. 2020, 11, 74–83.
124. Sang, G.M.; Xu, L.; de Vrieze, P.; Bai, Y. Towards Predictive Maintenance for Flexible Manufacturing Using FIWARE; Springer:
Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2020; pp. 17–28.
125. Goel, R.; Gupta, P. Robotics and industry 4.0. In A Roadmap to Industry 4.0: Smart Production, Sharp Business and Sustainable
Development; Nayyar, A., Kumar, A., Eds.; Springer: Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2020; pp. 157–169.
126. Krueger, V.; Rovida, F.; Grossmann, B.; Petrick, R.; Crosby, M.; Charzoule, A.; Martin Garcia, G.; Behnke, S.; Toscano, C.; Veiga, G.
Testing the Vertical and Cyber-Physical Integration of Cognitive Robots in Manufacturing. Robot. Comput. Integr. Manuf. 2019, 57,
213–229. [CrossRef]
127. Dhanabalan, T.; Sathish, A. Transforming Indian Industries through Artificial Intelligence and Robotics in Industry 4.0. Int. J.
Mech. Eng. Technol. 2018, 9, 835–845.
128. Bragança, S.; Costa, E.; Castellucci, I.; Arezes, P.M. A Brief Overview of the Use of Collaborative Robots in Industry 4.0: Human
Role and Safety. In Occupational and Environmental Safety and Health; Arezes, P.M., Baptista, J.S., Barroso, M.P., Carneiro, P.,
Cordeiro, P., Costa, N., Melo, R.B., Miguel, A.S., Perestrelo, G., Eds.; Springer: Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2019; pp. 641–650.
129. Karabegovi´c, I.; Karabegovi´c, E.; Mahmi´c, M.; Husak, E. Implementation of Industry 4.0 and Industrial Robots in the Manufacturing
Processes; Springer: Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2019; pp. 3–14.
130. Fragapane, G.; Ivanov, D.; Peron, M.; Sgarbossa, F.; Strandhagen, J.O. Increasing Flexibility and Productivity in Industry 4.0
Production Networks with Autonomous Mobile Robots and Smart Intralogistics. Ann. Oper. Res. 2020, 1–19. [CrossRef]
131. Karabegovi´c, I. The Role of Industrial and Service Robots in the 4th Industrial Revolution—“Industry 4.0”. Acta Tech. Corviniensis
Bull. Eng. 2018, 11, 11–16.
132. Wan, J.; Tang, S.; Hua, Q.; Li, D.; Liu, C.; Lloret, J. Context-Aware Cloud Robotics for Material Handling in Cognitive Industrial
Internet of Things. IEEE Internet Things J. 2017, 5, 2272–2281. [CrossRef]
133. Culot, G.; Fattori, F.; Podrecca, M.; Sartor, M. Addressing Industry 4.0 Cybersecurity Challenges. IEEE Eng. Manag. Rev. 2019, 47,
79–86. [CrossRef]
134. Ervural, B.C.; Ervural, B. Overview of cyber security in the industry 4.0 era. In Industry 4.0: Managing the Digital Transformation;
Ustundag, A., Cevikcan, E., Eds.; Springer: Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2018; pp. 267–284.
135. Rubio, J.E.; Roman, R.; Lopez, J. Analysis of Cybersecurity Threats in Industry 4.0: The Case of Intrusion Detection; Springer:
Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2017; pp. 119–130.
136. Elmamy, S.B.; Mrabet, H.; Gharbi, H.; Jemai, A.; Trentesaux, D. A Survey on the Usage of Blockchain Technology for Cyber-Threats
in the Context of Industry 4.0. Sustainability 2020, 12, 9179. [CrossRef]
137. Lezzi, M.; Lazoi, M.; Corallo, A. Cybersecurity for Industry 4.0 in the Current Literature: A Reference Framework. Comput. Ind.
2018, 103, 97–110. [CrossRef]
138. Ghobakhloo,M. The Future ofManufacturing Industry: A Strategic Roadmap toward Industry 4.0. J.Manuf. Technol. Manag. 2018.
[CrossRef]
139. Wegner, A.; Graham, J.; Ribble, E. A new approach to cyberphysical security in industry 4.0. In Cybersecurity for Industry 4.0;
Thames, L., Schaefer, D., Eds.; Springer: Berlin/Heidelberg, Germany, 2017; pp. 59–72.
140. Jamwal, A.; Agrawal, R.; Sharma, M.; Kumar, V. Review on Multi-Criteria Decision Analysis in Sustainable Manufacturing
Decision Making. Int. J. Sustain. Eng. 2021. [CrossRef]
141. Vinuesa, R.; Azizpour, H.; Leite, I.; Balaam, M.; Dignum, V.; Domisch, S.; Felländer, A.; Langhans, S.D.; Tegmark, M.; Nerini, F.F.
The Role of Artificial Intelligence in Achieving the Sustainable Development Goals. Nat. Commun. 2020, 11, 1–10. [CrossRef]
142. Ghobakhloo, M. Industry 4.0, Digitization, and Opportunities for Sustainability. J. Clean. Prod. 2020, 252. [CrossRef]
Appl. Sci. 2021, 11, 5725 27 of 27
143. Braccini, A.M.; Margherita, E.G. Exploring Organizational Sustainability of Industry 4.0 under the Triple Bottom Line: The Case
of a Manufacturing Company. Sustainability 2018, 11, 36. [CrossRef]
144. Brozzi, R.; Forti, D.; Rauch, E.; Matt, D.T. The Advantages of Industry 4.0 Applications for Sustainability: Results from a Sample
of Manufacturing Companies. Sustainability 2020, 12, 3647. [CrossRef]
145. Müller, J.M.; Voigt, K.-I. Sustainable Industrial Value Creation in SMEs: A Comparison between Industry 4.0 and Made in China
2025. Int. J. Precis. Eng. Manuf. Green Technol. 2018, 5, 659–670. [CrossRef]
146. Luthra, S.; Kumar, A.; Zavadskas, E.K.;Mangla, S.K.; Garza-Reyes, J.A. Industry 4.0 as an Enabler of Sustainability Diffusion in Supply
Chain: An Analysis of Influential Strength of Drivers in an Emerging Economy. Int. J. Prod. Res. 2020, 58, 1505–1521. [CrossRef]
147. Vrchota, J.; Pech, M.; Rolínek, L.; Bednáˇr, J. Sustainability Outcomes of Green Processes in Relation to Industry 4.0 in Manufacturing:
Systematic Review. Sustainability 2020, 12, 5968. [CrossRef]
148. Tayal, A.; Solanki, A.; Singh, S.P. Integrated Frame Work for Identifying Sustainable Manufacturing Layouts Based on Big Data,
Machine Learning, Meta-Heuristic and Data Envelopment Analysis. Sustain. Cities Soc. 2020, 62. [CrossRef]
149. Waibel, M.W.; Oosthuizen, G.A.; Du Toit, D.W. Investigating Current Smart Production Innovations in the Machine Building
Industry on Sustainability Aspects. In Procedia Manufacturing, Proceedings of the 15th Global Conference on Sustainable Manufacturing,
Haifa, Israel, 25–27 September 2018; Shpitalni, M., Kagermann, H., Seliger, G., Wertheim, R., Fischer, A., Eds.; Elsevier B.V.:
Amsterdam, The Netherlands, 2018; Volume 21, pp. 774–781.
150. Ghobakhloo, M.; Fathi, M. Corporate Survival in Industry 4.0 Era: The Enabling Role of Lean-Digitized Manufacturing. J. Manuf.
Technol. Manag. 2020, 31, 1–30. [CrossRef]
151. Bhanot, N.; Rao, P.V.; Deshmukh, S.G. Enablers and Barriers of Sustainable Manufacturing: Results from a Survey of Researchers
and Industry Professionals. In Procedia CIRP, Proceedings of the 22nd CIRP Conference on Life Cycle Engineering, Sydney, Australia,
7–9 April 2015; Kara, S., Ed.; Elsevier B.V.: Amsterdam, The Netherlands, 2015; Volume 29, pp. 562–567.
152. Manupati, V.K.; Schoenherr, T.; Ramkumar, M.; Wagner, S.M.; Pabba, S.K.; Inder Raj Singh, R. A Blockchain-Based Approach for a
Multi-Echelon Sustainable Supply Chain. Int. J. Prod. Res. 2020, 58, 2222–2241. [CrossRef]
153. Afshari, H.; Searcy, C.; Jaber, M.Y. The Role of Eco-Innovation Drivers in Promoting Additive Manufacturing in Supply Chains.
Int. J. Prod. Econ. 2020, 223. [CrossRef]
154. Bag, S.; Telukdarie, A.; Pretorius, J.H.C.; Gupta, S. Industry 4.0 and Supply Chain Sustainability: Framework and Future Research
Directions. Benchmarking 2018. [CrossRef]
155. Belaud, J.-P.; Prioux, N.; Vialle, C.; Sablayrolles, C. Big Data for Agri-Food 4.0: Application to Sustainability Management for
by-Products Supply Chain. Comput. Ind. 2019, 111, 41–50. [CrossRef]
156. Laney, D. 3D Data Management: Controlling Data Volume, Velocity and Variety. META Group Res. Note 2001, 6, 1.
157. Ren, S.; Zhang, Y.; Liu, Y.; Sakao, T.; Huisingh, D.; Almeida, C.M.V.B. A Comprehensive Review of Big Data Analytics throughout
Product Lifecycle to Support Sustainable Smart Manufacturing: A Framework, Challenges and Future Research Directions. J.
Clean. Prod. 2019, 210, 1343–1365. [CrossRef]
158. Kumar, A.; Shankar, R.; Thakur, L.S. A Big Data Driven Sustainable Manufacturing Framework for Condition-Based Maintenance
Prediction. J. Comput. Sci. 2018, 27, 428–439. [CrossRef]
159. Collins, K. Cyber-Physical Production Networks, Real-Time Big Data Analytics, and Cognitive Automation in Sustainable Smart
Manufacturing. J. Self-Gov. Manag. Econ. 2020, 8, 21–27. [CrossRef]
160. Dubey, R.; Gunasekaran, A.; Childe, S.J.; Wamba, S.F.; Papadopoulos, T. The Impact of Big Data on World-Class Sustainable
Manufacturing. Int. J. Adv. Manuf. Technol. 2016, 84, 631–645. [CrossRef]
161. Hack-Polay, D.; Rahman, M.; Billah, M.M.; Al-Sabbahy, H.Z. Big Data Analytics and Sustainable Textile Manufacturing: Decision-
Making about the Applications of Biotechnologies in Developing Countries. Manag. Decis. 2020. [CrossRef]
162. Plumpton, D. Cyber-Physical Systems, Internet of Things, and Big Data in Industry 4.0: DigitalManufacturing Technologies, Business
Process Optimization, and Sustainable Organizational Performance. Econ. Manag. Financ. Mark. 2019, 14, 23–29. [CrossRef]
163. Ali, S.S.; Kaur, R.; Persis, D.J.; Saha, R.; Pattusamy, M.; Sreedharan, V.R. Developing a Hybrid Evaluation Approach for the Low
Carbon Performance on Sustainable Manufacturing Environment. Ann. Oper. Res. 2020. [CrossRef]
164. Hayhoe, T.; Podhorska, I.; Siekelova, A.; Stehel, V. SustainableManufacturing in Industry 4.0: Cross-Sector Networks ofMultiple
Supply Chains, Cyber-Physical Production Systems, and Ai-Driven Decision-Making. J. Self-Gov. Manag. Econ. 2019, 7, 31–36.
[CrossRef]
165. Jung, H.; Jeon, J.; Choi, D.; Park, J.-Y. Application of Machine Learning Techniques in Injection Molding Quality Prediction:
Implications on Sustainable Manufacturing Industry. Sustainability 2021, 13, 4120. [CrossRef]
166. Schorr, S.; Möller, M.; Heib, J.; Fang, S.; Bähre, D. Quality Prediction of Reamed Bores Based on Process Data and Machine
Learning Algorithm: A Contribution to a More Sustainable Manufacturing. In Procedia Manufacturing, Proceedings of the 17th
Global Conference on Sustainable Manufacturing, Shanghai, China, 9–11 October 2020; Seliger, G., Kagermann, H., Ganiyusufoglu,
O.S., Zhang, W., Eds.; Elsevier B.V.: Amsterdam, The Netherlands, 2020; Volume 43, pp. 519–526.
